<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89106-0015 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.1-06-89.f2.A1014</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 3 / Friday, January 6, 1989 /Rules and Regulations<ITAG tagnum="50">DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">15 CFR Parts 970 and 971 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="41">[Docket No. 50712-8052] </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Deep Seabed Mining; Final Regulations for Commercial Recovery andRevision of Regulations for Exploration </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, Commerce.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>Pub. L. 96-283, the Deep Seabed Hard Mineral ResourcesAct (the Act) authorizes the Administrator of the National Oceanic andAtmospheric Administration (NOAA) to issue, to eligible United States citizenapplicants, licenses for exploration for and permits for the commercialrecovery of deep seabed hard mineral resources. The Act also requires thatNOAA issue regulations with respect to deep seabed mining licenses andpermits. These rules set forth the procedures and substantive requirementsaccording to the terms of the Act pursuant to which U.S. citizens may applyfor and NOAA will issue commercial recovery permits. Through the Act andthese rules the United States exercises a freedom of the high seas underaccepted principles of international law.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>DATES: </T2>These rules will become effective February 6, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ADDRESSES: </T2>Inquiries and submissions should be mailed to: <ITAG tagnum="15">Ocean Minerals and Energy Division, Office of Ocean and Coastal ResourceManagement, National Ocean Service, NOAA, 1825 Connecticut Avenue, NW.,Suite 710, Washington, DC 20235.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>James P. Lawless, Chief, OceanMinerals and Energy Division (202) 673-5121, or John W. Padan, ProgramManager, Deep Seabed Mining (202) 673-5117, at the above address.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>During 1980 and 1981, NOAA engagedin its first rulemaking to implement the Act and issued regulations onSeptember 15, 1981, pertaining to exploration by U.S. citizens for deepseabed hard mineral resources (15 CFR Part 970). NOAA now issues regulations to implement the Act with respect to commercialrecovery. These regulations are intended to complete the next phase ofimplementation and thus provide a basis for major long-term planning anddecisions by current and potential operators. NOAA recognizes that developments such as changes in technology, the availabilityof new environmental data and results of monitoring, and the potentialfuture national need for manganese, may necessitate future changes in theregulations adopted pursuant to this rulemaking. Consequently, the regulationsare designed to encourage the development of technology necessary to recoverdeep seabed manganese nodules by providing a clear regime now, for corporateplanning purposes, while allowing for changes in regulations, if needed,and deferring detailed decisions on permit-specific terms, conditions andrestrictions (TCRs) until the time of permit issuance. This two stage processwill facilitate planning, by enabling planners to know now the generallevels of efforts that will be required, and their approximate costs, withoutprecluding the opportunity for future research results and improvementsin state of the art to be reflected in the TCRs. The regulations also recognizethe need for flexibility in order to promote the development of deep seabedmining techniques and systems in a manner compatible with the requirementsof the Act and regulations. <ITAG tagnum="84">Structure of the Regulations </ITAG>The regulations are structured to present procedures and requirements inthe approximate chronological order in which they will be encountered inthe application process. The regulations begin by setting out their underlyingpurpose and the basic legal premises established by the Act, as well asthe definitions applicable to the rules. The steps that the applicant andNOAA will follow are set forth mostly in Subparts B through D while themore substantive discussion of major issues that arise during the courseof issuing and operating under a permit are found primarily in SubpartsE-G. Miscellaneous, procedural and enforcement provisions are in SubpartsH-J. <ITAG tagnum="84">Public Comment Opportunities </ITAG>NOAA published an Advance Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (ANPR) on commercialrecovery regulations on December 28, 1982, 47 FR 57903, soliciting earlyparticipation by interested parties in the rulemaking. After receivingcomments from the public, NOAA held workshops in June 1983 for Federalofficials interested in manganese retention and in July 1983 on coordinationof Federal responsibilities affecting onshore activities. NOAA producedan issue paper and held a public workshop on marine environmental issuesin September 1983 to gather further input and technical expertise to assistin the development of these regulations. Another discussion paper on otherdeep seabed mining issues, taking into account comments received in responseto the ANPR, was also circulated for public comment during the same period.In developing these regulations NOAA has made a continuing effort to providefor and encourage public participation.On July 25, 1986, NOAA published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> and distributed for public comment a Notice ofProposed Rulemaking (51 FR 26794). Copies of the proposed rules were mailedto a wide variety of interested groups and individuals on the NOAA deepseabed mining mailing list. Notices of public hearings held in conjunctionwith this rulemaking were also published in local newspapers serving thepublic in the regions where the hearings were located. Five public hearingswere held relating to this rulemaking: one each on August 26 in Washington,DC and September 9 in San Francisco, and two in Honolulu and one in Hilo,Hawaii, on September 11. The original 90 day public comment period wasextended an additional 30 days through November 24, 1986, in response toa request from several concerned parties. Comments on the proposed regulationswere received from twenty-six sources, including industry, State representatives,environmental groups, other Federal agencies and interested citizens. Copiesof the comments and transcripts of the public hearings are available forreview at the above address.Comments on several of the issues led NOAA to recognize that the best approachmight be to propose regulations different than originally proposed. Accordingly,on September 14, 1987, NOAA published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> and distributed for public comment a supplementalproposed rule (52 FR 34748). Again, copies of the supplement were mailedto a wide variety of interested groups and individuals on the NOAA deepseabed mining mailing list. In order to provide additional time for potentialcommenters, the original 45 day comment period was extended an additional15 days to November 13, 1987.The supplemental proposal consisted of three environmental issues and oneissue involving the appropriate mechanism for handling antitrust information.First, several comments on the original proposal revealed a concern overwhat was perceived to be a dearth of environmental guidelines, particularlygiven the infancy of the industry and technology and a relative lack ofknowledge of the deep sea environment. Accordingly, NOAA proposed to establishcriteria to be considered for the determination of significant adverseenvironmental effects, patterning the approach after the Ocean DischargeCriteria of the Clean Water Act regulations (40 CFR Part 125, Subpart M).Second, in lieu of specifying what would be Best Available Technologies(BAT), NOAA proposed to require an applicant to demonstrate his use ofBAT and to submit a mitigation plan for a potential need to deal with anenvironmental problem triggered by the discharge of mining wastes ontothe ocean's surface. Third, the at-sea monitoring requirements were slightlyrefined to require the monitoring of benthic impact through the study oftwo types of areas: An Impact Reference Area; and an interim PreservationalReference Area.The Antitrust issue involved the identification of the Department of Justice(DOJ) comments on the original issue of whether or not NOAA should requireapplicants to submit to NOAA information for subsequent review by DOJ andthe Federal Trade Commission.All four issues are discussed further, below.Comments on the supplemental proposed rule were received from eighteensources, including industry, State representatives, environmental groups,a trade organization, interested citizens, and other Federal agencies.<ITAG tagnum="84">Summary of Comments and Responses</ITAG>The comments submitted in response to the Notice of Proposed Rulemakingand supplemental proposed rule were useful in assisting NOAA in its considerationof the issues raised in implementing its responsibilities under the Act.A number of the comments provided improvements and refinements to the generalapproach proposed by NOAA, while others were the basis for clarificationof specific provisions. The following summarizes the major comments andNOAA's responses.General Comments<T3>Timing.</T3>_The issue of NOAA's early promulgation of commercial regulationswas the subject of many comments. Most commenters were in favor of theearly establishment of a regulatory regime that contains sufficient flexibilityto accommodate conditions and unforeseen problems that may occur when commercialmining actually begins. One specific comment stated that knowing the rulesin advance is useful to industry for planning purposes in preparing tomake the transition from the exploration phase to commercial recovery.One commenter that was against early promulgation felt that the regulationswere premature and unnecessary at this time because of industry's diminishedinterest in mining brought about by the depressed metals market. Anotherfelt that there may be changes in technology, mine sites, consortia composition,Law of the Sea structure and international interests which may affect theregulations in the future. NOAA feels that promulgation of the basic commercialregulations is the best course of action. This decision takes account ofthe comments received and recognizes the usefulness of early notice tooperators of the information required for permit evaluation and issuance,so that they can continue with their orderly planning for the developmentof these resources. It also takes account of long-range national interestsof the United States in access to deep seabed hard minerals. In decidingto issue these regulations now, NOAA recognizes that the regulations canbe revised as future technological or other needs arise, and that the structureunder the Act allows for addressing key issues in more detail as appropriatein TCRs at the time of issuing each permit.<T3>Approach.</T3>_Five commenters, representing a wide spectrum of interestgroups, were supportive of NOAA's approach to the implementation of thecommercial recovery aspects of the Act. Three of the commenters went onto specify aspects of the NOAA approach they believed to be especiallyappropriate. One dealt with the manner in which Coastal Zone ManagementAct Federal consistency requirements were reflected in the proposed rules.A second commenter thought the proposed rules were derived from the Act,in a clear and specific manner. Finally, one commenter opined that theproposed rules generally meet the need for encouraging development (ofthe resource) consistent with the Act. <ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart A_General </ITAG><T3>Definitions.</T3>_The two commenters who addressed the definitionssupported NOAA's adding the definition of ``significant adverse environmentaleffect,'' ``irreparable harm'' and ``environment.'' One, however, suggestedthat ``environment'' should be expanded to include the coastal zone. Whilethe present definition might conceivably include portions of the coastalzone (i.e., affected transportation corridors), NOAA believes that includingthe entire coastal zone is too broad. The Act as implemented through theseregulations applies only to commercial recovery activities, and such abroad definition of ``environment'' would extend beyond the statutory definitionof ``commercial recovery.'' Although the National Environmental PolicyAct (NEPA) requires NOAA to consider other effects in its EIS, NOAA's authorityunder the Act to regulate activities in the coastal zone is limited. Rather,regulatory authority there rests essentially with the States or with otherFederal agencies such as EPA and the Corps of Engineers. This commenter also pointed out that including the limiting term ``discharge''in the definitions of ``irreparable harm'' and ``significant adverse environmentaleffect'' is too narrow. NOAA agrees. NOAA's approach was based on the conclusionthat the environmental perturbations from commercial recovery activitieswould be consistent with ``discharges'' as covered by EPA's NPDES permits,although they may fall outside that term as defined by EPA and should notbe so limited. The term ``discharge'' therefore has been dropped from NOAA'sdefinitions. Another commenter noted that the proposed definition of ``significant adverseenvironmental effect'' itself included the term ``significant,'' and recommendedthat this term be defined in accordance with the NOAA Directives Manualfor implementing NEPA. NOAA believes it is inappropriate in this case touse a definition from its NEPA procedures, since those are intended toprovide a standard as to when the agency should prepare an EIS. The Actalready includes the policy determination that an EIS should be preparedon the issuance of each permit. The term ``significant'' as used in theAct and the above definition is intended for a different standard, i.e.,on whether to issue or require changes to a permit. The purpose for includinga qualifying term was to clarify that the effect had to be important, butNOAA acknowledges the potential redundancy in using a term within its owndefinition. Therefore, the intent of the definition is now expressed bythe word ``important.'' One commenter suggested that the clause ``which is unreasonable in relationto the benefit derived from the discharge'' be deleted from the third partof the definition of ``significant adverse environmental effect,'' becauseshe believed the level of impact should be determined before, not after,project benefits are weighed. NOAA is willing to delete the specified phrase.However, we believe that the third part of the definition needs qualifyinglanguage to make it compatible with the overall definition, which is intendedto address ``significant'' effects. The term ``important'' thus is usedhere as well. <ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart B_Applications </ITAG><T3>Recognition of Previous Activities.</T3>_Several commenters submittedviews relating to the need for an applicant to receive proper credit forprevious activities in the context of an application for a commercial recoverypermit. NOAA acknowledges this as a valid concept. NOAA had, in fact, previouslyrealized that information originally submitted with an operator's explorationlicense application was likely also to relate to the Act's informationrequirements for a commercial recovery permit. NOAA noted this point inthe proposed rules and so provided in proposed andSection; 971.200(e). Italso is clear that information submitted in a licensee's annual reportsto NOAA would be relevant to subsequent permit application requirements.These considerations mean that an operator under an exploration license,who applies for a commercial recovery permit, is likely to have to submitless new information than a transferee who is a new entity. Although, inaccordance with the Act, each applicant must meet a single set of standards,in practical terms the prior operator will have more information and a``track record'' on file with NOAA that could be relied upon for certaindeterminations required for issuing a commercial recovery permit. NOAAhas further emphasized the above concept by expanding andSection;andSection;971.200 (c) and (e). <T3>Statement of Financial Resources.</T3>_One commenter proposed thatthe regulations contain the added requirement that issuance of a permitis contingent upon the applicant actually obtaining the financial resources.NOAA has determined that this requirement would be inappropriate for thisparticular portion of the regulations. Rather, NOAA believes that the provisionson diligence after permit issuance adequately address the issue raisedby this comment, i.e., that the operator proceed with his proposed activities.A commenter also proposed that the regulations call for an applicant todemonstrate adequate financial resources to compensate injured partiesor to cover the cost of clean up or restoration of natural resources. NOAAhas concluded that its authority under the Act pertaining to an applicant'sfinancial resources does not go so far as requiring resources for suchcompensation payments. However, should NOAA in the future determine thata reclamation TCR would be appropriate, then the financial implicationsof such a requirement could be included in NOAA's analysis of an applicant'sfinancial capability.A commenter also suggested that more detailed information be provided bythe applicant, including a statement of financing feasibility from financingentities. On the other hand, several commenters indicated that, at thetime of an application, an applicant cannot obtain a commitment of funds.They pointed out that the issue of financial resources can be addressedonly in general terms prior to obtaining a commercial recovery permit,and at that stage an applicant could be expected only to demonstrate reasonablelikelihood of access to funding. They proposed that any further detailor justification would be unreasonable at that time in their operationsplanning. NOAA agrees that available financial information likely wouldbe more limited prior to issuance of a permit. NOAA also has concludedthat more general information is sufficient to establish an applicant'sfinancial responsibility, and generally had intended such an approach tothis issue. Section 971.201(b) has been revised to clarify the nature ofinformation which should be included in an application.<T3>Statement of Technological Experience and Capabilities</T3>._This subjectis a prime example of where pre-existing information which NOAA has froma permit applicant's earlier application for an exploration license, orfrom his subsequent reports of exploration activities conducted under alicense, may be referenced in the context of the commercial recovery permitapplication. This was the major thrust of several comments on proposedandSection; 971.202, and NOAA agrees. NOAA has highlighted this approachby inserting a reference to the clarified andSection; 971.200(e).A commenter also proposed that, in view of first generation miners presentingplans for prototype technology, applicants should have freedom in the formby which their technical data and information are presented. NOAA believesthis is appropriate, and the regulations were modified to enhance suchflexibility.One commenter suggested that the regulations require the testing of a miningsystem prior to applying for a commercial recovery permit; in the absenceof such tests, the regulations and TCRs should specify the very preliminary,tentative nature of relevant determinations. Each of the existing licenseeshas in fact conducted at-sea testing of mining equipment, and testing maybe conducted under an exploration license. Even considering this and thefact that NOAA is sympathetic with one comment that testing and monitoringshould be encouraged, NOAA does not believe that such activities are absolutelynecessary to demonstrate technological capability. At the time of NOAA'smaking final determinations on a permit application, however, TCRs wouldtake account of any future information or verification requirements.One commenter also suggested that the ``best available technologies'' requirementof the Act should be addressed in this section of the regulations. NOAAacknowledges this requirement in section 109(b) of the Act. It is addressedin andSection;andSection; 971.423, 971.203(b)(3), 971.604 (a) and (c) and 971.602(f).Therefore, NOAA believes it is inappropriate to address the issue in andSection;971.202.One commenter suggested that the regulations require training and certification,and expressed its particular interest in health and safety standards inthis regard. NOAA has specifically addressed health and safety aspectselsewhere in the regulations_in andSection;andSection; 971.205, 971.407 and971.422, and in Subpart G_relying on Coast Guard vessel safety and inspectionrequirements. NOAA believes that this aspect is adequately addressed inthose sections.<T3>Commercial Recovery Plan</T3>._Several commenters expressed concernthat NOAA was requesting unrealistic detail in a commercial recovery plan,given the 20-year duration of a permit. NOAA had intended to take thisconsideration into account, as reflected in the terms of proposed andSection;971.203(a), wherein more detail was requested for the period leading upto commercial recovery. This subsection has been further clarified to saythat the plan would project anticipated 20-year activities in a generalway, and to acknowledge that a plan in advance of commercial operationswould be preliminary and subject to change.The comments also indicate some question as to whether NOAA's regulationsconformed to the elements of a commercial recovery plan as set forth insection 103(a)(2)(C) of the Act. To confirm this conformance to the Act,andSection; 971.203(b) has been revised to repeat more accurately these elementsas they are set forth in the Act, while retaining cross references specifyingrequirements or determinations to which each element relates. NOAA findssuch cross references helpful for its own purposes, and believes they wouldbe helpful also for others. In the course of revising andSection; 971.203(b),a provision for characterizing the proposed mining system, in terms ofenvironmental effects, has been moved to andSection; 971.603(b), as partof the monitoring plan.Several commenters focussed specifically on the issue of the ``logicalmining unit'' (LMU), in one case seeking more restriction, and in othersproposing more discretion by applicants. One commenter suggested that NOAAestablish the LMU size; another recommended that the LMU be as small aspossible. Both suggestions appear to be motivated by a concern for benthicimpact. This concern drives several of the proposed rules but the Act doesnot allow LMU size to be subject to its influence. This raises the questionof what is the applicant's role versus NOAA's role in determining an appropriatecommercial recovery area. The Act and regulations reflect that the applicantwill select the size and location of the area, which area will be approvedunless the Administrator finds that, among other considerations, the areais not a logical mining unit. Section 103(a)(2)(E) of the Act and andSection;971.501 define an LMU, on which definition NOAA will rely in making itsdetermination. As a basis for making this determination, NOAA must havecertain information on resource assessment from the applicant. The regulationsidentify this element of the commercial recovery plan as the one primarilyrelevant to the required LMU determination.One commenter suggested that environmental consequences of onshore processingshould be included in the commercial recovery plan. NOAA believes thissubject is addressed in the statutory elements which are listed in andSection;971.203(b)(3), (6), and (7).<T3>Environmental Baseline Data.</T3>_Many comments were received concerningthe need for a requirement for the applicant to submit environmental baselineinformation with the permit application. Several comments also mentionedthat NOAA should list the required baseline environmental information necessaryfor EIS and TCR preparation. The regulations have been revised in andSection;971.204 to reflect these comments. Specifically, a list of environmentalbaseline parameters was added from NOAA's Deep Seabed Mining TechnicalGuidance Document pertaining to the upper and lower water column. Theseparameters should be included in the EIS prepared on a permit issued foran area that lies within the area of NOAA's earlier Deep Ocean Mining EnvironmentalStudy (DOMES). For a permit area outside the DOMES area, the applicantis encouraged to consult early with NOAA in order to determine the specificparameters that will be required to be measured. The regulations now containa provision that the Administrator may require the submission of additionaldata if he determines that the basis for a suitable EIS, or a determinationof appropriate TCRs, is not available. They also clarify that the EIS mustcharacterize the environment in such a way as to provide a basis for judgingthe potential for significant adverse effects or irreparable harm to theenvironment.It was also suggested by one commenter than NOAA should assure that ithas the means to measure the adequacy of the existing environmental informationand to assess the need for the applicant to collect additional baselineinformation before the permit application can be processed. This commenterhad in mind that NOAA should consult with experts in specific fields, includingaffected States, as appropriate. NOAA concurs with this recommendation.The procedures in the regulations allow for such consultations in general,and they also contain specific reference to consultation with States, assummarized below.<T3>State Involvement._</T3>Four commenters expressed concern that theproposed regulations did not provide for sufficient State agency consultationin decision-making. Two commenters specifically requested that States beconsulted by NOAA in making its determination as to whether permit applicationsare complete for processing and that NOAA notify the applicant, or at aminimum consult with any affected State, regarding the need for a Federalconsistency certification which may be required in compliance with theCoastal Zone Management Act, as amended. Three commenters expressed a needfor formal inclusion of State interests in the public hearing and commentprocess, and another commenter expressed a desire for an ``open channel''for State input to NOAA at times other than specifically designated commentperiods. Two commenters stated that States would not begin the Federalconsistency determination process until the final EIS and TCRs were inhand.Due to the absence of any special provisions in the Act relating to States,NOAA believes the overriding applicable law and procedures are those underthe Federal consistency provisions of the Coastal Zone Management Act.Section 971.101 contains new definitions, ``Affected State'' and ``Stateagency,'' which are compatible with that statute. However, NOAA has consideredthe views of the commenters and has incorporated more specific opportunitiesfor State agency consultation into the final regulations, which are compatiblewith the Federal consistency procedures. Sections 971.200(g), 971.212,971.213, 971.401, 971.402, 971.419(b), 971.430, 971.606(b) and 971.802(g)now contain language which will encourage applicants to consult with affectedStates and local agencies as early as is practicable in the developmentof a permit application, and which clarifies formal opportunities for commentsby affected States. In this way applicants can be aware of the Federal,State and other requirements and concerns which may help to shape the mineralmining and processing stages of commercial recovery. Other sections_andSection;andSection;971.200(h) and 971.412(f)_explicitly state the need for an applicant fora commercial recovery permit to meet the substantive and procedural requirementsof the Coastal Zone Management Act and 15 CFR Part 930, Subpart D, whereapplicable. Under these provisions the State agency shall be responsiblefor coordinating comments with other State, regional and local agencies.Although other agencies will be involved in the formal review and commentprocess preceding a final decision on certification of an application andissuance of a commercial recovery permit, the Administrator will determinewhether an application for a commercial recovery permit is complete forformal processing under the Act. NOAA will make a concerted effort to workwith other Federal and State agencies to satisfy mutual requirements forinformation where possible; however, due to the possible lead time involvedin applying for a commercial recovery permit authorizing the offshore operationsfor deep seabed mining, it may not be possible to incorporate all the informationrequirements of those other permits needed for later stages of mineralrecovery and waste disposal. However, NOAA does require applicants to supplysufficient information with the commercial recovery permit applicationto give full disclosure of these other commerical activities in the EISas an indirect impact associated with issuance of the commercial recoverypermit.Comments received from other Federal agencies, affected State agencies,and the public in response to the draft EIS and proposed TCRs will be consideredin issuance of a commercial recovery permit. Permittees will also be puton notice in a TCR attached to the permit, that receipt of the NOAA permitdoes not alleviate the need to satisfy all other necessary statutory andregulatory requirements for proposed activities contained in the commercialrecovery plan. Statutory and regulatory requirements other than those underthe Act are not considered to be satisfied through issuance of the commercialrecovery permit.<T3>U.S. Vessel Requirements._</T3>One commenter suggested it might beappropriate to define U.S. citizen for the purposes of the mining vessel_tobe 100 percent American ownership with no foreign fiduciary obligation_inorder to shield against foreign investments or construction diluting longrange national interests of the United States. U.S. vessel requirementsare specifically addressed in section 102(c) of the Act, which provisionsare incorporated into these regulations (e.g. andSection;andSection; 971.205(a)and 971.422 and Subpart G). NOAA does not have authority to establish U.S.vessel requirements beyond those in the Act, such as the suggested definition.<T3>Antitrust Information.</T3>_NOAA requested comments on whether informationrelated to the antitrust review, referenced in section 103(d) of the Act,should be specified in NOAA regulations as part of a commercial recoverypermit application, or whether NOAA should play a role of advising a potentialapplicant informally as to what information the applicant should be preparedto provide to the Department of Justice (DOJ) and Federal Trade Commission(FTC), should those agencies request information under their own authorities.NOAA also set forth the antitrust information needs which generally hadbeen identified by DOJ and FTC.Two commenters' responses supported having NOAA's regulations require specifiedantitrust information as part of a commercial recovery permit application,with the specified ability of DOJ and FTC to obtain additional informationif necessary for antitrust review. They also highlighted the need for adequateinformation in the first place before the time period for antitrust reviewshould be allowed to run.Three other commenters stated that they would prefer to submit all informationin one application and through a single process_NOAA's permitting process_indicatingthat under the rules NOAA should maintain a ``lead agency'' function orserve as the single source of control and deadlines with this informationas well as other permitting information. However, two of them said theywould not want NOAA to include the details on antitrust information inthe regulation; rather, the rule should make reference only to informationwhich is relevant for the particular applicant with respect to antitrustreview.On the basis of these comments, NOAA has retained in andSection; 971.211the provisions for antitrust review, which reflect the statutory provisionson this subject. In order to assure that adequate information is availablefor the prescribed review, the rule clarifies that the review period followsreceipt of an application that NOAA has determined pursuant to andSection;971.210 to be complete. As for setting forth actual information requirements,andSection; 971.207 only specifies that antitrust information with an applicationmust be sufficient, in the view of the applicant and based on pre-applicationconsultations, to identify the application and describe any significantexisting market share it has with respect to the mining or marketing ofthe metals to be recovered under the permit.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart D_Issuance/Transfer/Terms, Conditions and Restrictions</ITAG><T3>Processing Outside U.S.</T3>_One commenter proposed dropping all restrictionson foreign processing, failing to realize that the restriction is a provisionof the Act.Two commenters recommended that the applicant submit an environmental assessment.Section 971.606(c) incorporates provisions for relevant onshore informationoutside the United States, when such processing is proposed, and has beenreferenced in andSection; 971.408(d) for clarity.One commenter stated that NOAA should not allow a permittee to operateunder a lesser environmental standard, outside the U.S., than would bethe case in the U.S. Imposition of environmental requirements on processingabroad is beyond the authority of the Act, however Executive Order 12114,requiring the environmental review of major Federal actions abroad, isapplicable.<T3>Duration of Permit._</T3>Two commenters believed the 20-year durationof a permit to be too long given the infancy of the industry and the relativelack of environmental information on the deep sea environment, particularlythe deep sea benthos. It was suggested that the length of permit be limitedto time periods on the order of 5 years, with renewal contingent upon afinding of no significant adverse effect, diligence in exploration, andcompliance with the TCRs.The provision for a 20-year permit, ``and for so long thereafter as hardmineral resources are recovered annually in commercial quantities fromthe area to which the recovery plan associated with the permit applies,''comes directly from the Act and therefore remains unchanged in the permitregulations. However, as discussed under environmental effects (andSection;971.406 and andSection;971.601), the regulations have been modified to accountfor the situation where there is insufficient information to adequatelyaddress the issue as to whether the commercial recovery proposed in a permitapplication can be expected to result in significant adverse effects onthe environment. Now, if there is insufficient information to reasonablymake a determination on this issue, a permit may still be issued if thereis enough information to reasonably conclude that ``irreparable harm''will not occur during a period when an approved monitoring program is undertakento further examine the significant adverse effects issue. It is furthernoted that a permit is subject to modification or suspension, or ultimatelyrevocation, prior to the end of a 20-year permit term if significant adverseenvironmental effects are revealed by such monitoring. As noted above,``significant adverse environmental effect'' and ``irreparable harm'' arenew additions to the definition list.<ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart E_Resource Development</ITAG>All of the comments on this subpart dealt with one or more aspects of <T3>conservation, </T3>as outlined below:<T3>Mining Efficiency._</T3>Two commenters opined that there would be littleincentive to mine if a permittee were required to recover ``nearly allthe nodules'' in an area, statements that indicated that the proposed rulewas not drafted as clearly as it might have been. The ambiguous phrasehas been removed from andSection; 971.502(b).Several commenters agreed with the proposed rule which allows market forcesto effect a realistic efficiency of mining. One commenter recommended thatNOAA establish a threshold, but NOAA believes such a requirement wouldbe premature in view of the embryonic state of industrial development.NOAA is deleting the requirement of andSection;971.501(c), which requesteda discussion of prior test mining in relation to mining efficiency, toprovide a more consistent approach to the notion of allowing market pricesto prevail.<T3>Chronology of Mining Sub-areas._</T3>Two commenters questioned NOAA'sauthority to request a plan of the sequence in which a mine site's mineablesub-areas will be mined. One asserted that this would place an unnecessaryand difficult burden on pre-enactment explorers. Another stated that thechronology will only be generally known at the time of application. Anothercommenter offered the notion that NOAA's prime concern in this regard shouldbe to prevent waste from intentionally poor mining practices aimed at highprofits by ``gutting'' a site. This is precisely the motive behind theproposed andSection;andSection; 971.501(b) and 971.502(b); NOAA is requiredto address this issue by section 110 of the Act. In consideration of thecomments, proposed andSection; 971.501(b), which called for a chronologyof areas as part of a logical mining unit description, has been deleted.Subsection 971.502(b) has been clarified to provide that the descriptionof the sequence of mining is expected to be preliminary and subject tochange.<T3>Mining Patterns._</T3>Two commenters recommended that NOAA specifypatterns; two others opined that NOAA should allow operators to developtheir own patterns. NOAA is in sympathy with the latter view because patterns,efficiency, and chronology all are interrelated in the sense that theyshould comprise a mining strategy that takes into account the requirementsof the Act's conservation requirement. This strategy is to be discussedin the permit application, pursuant to andSection; 971.502(b). <T3>Conservation of Unprocessed Manganese._</T3>Comments from several partiesindicated an inference not intended by NOAA in the proposal in andSection;971.502(c), ``* * * not to render the magganese unavailable to future users,* * *'' by stating that forced recovery and storage would not be economic.NOAA's rule requires neither present recovery nor storage. One commenter approved of the proposed rule but asserted that the waiver(potentially allowing dispersal of tailings if necessary for the economicpracticability of the operation) would defeat the purpose. NOAA does notintend to grant waivers, if requested, automatically, but rather will balancethe need to encourage nodule mining against the potential future need formanganese, recognizing that the need is not likely to extend to all ofthe manganese generated by all of the operators. Another commenter stated that the authority of the Administrator to cancelthis waiver, as well as to amend the regulations in the event of a nationalneed for manganese, introduces an uncertainty which affects the economicdecisionmaking ability to permittees. NOAA agrees, but believes that theprivate sector is accustomed to caveats related to national emergencies.<T3>General._</T3>Two commenters disagreed with the wisdom of the exceptionin andSection; 971.804 whereby amended regulations dealing with conservationwould apply to then-existing permits only if they would not impose seriousor irreparable economic hardship on the permittee. This exception is requiredby the Act. <ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart F_Environmental Effects </ITAG><T3>General._</T3>Several comments were received on the adequacy of theenvironmental parts of the July 1986 proposed permit regulations. For instanceone coastal State agency noted that the broad general guidelines and principlesregarding environmental protection, ``* * * seems reasonable to us andwe believe that NOAA's research program concerning the deep seabed environmentcan yield information important to identifying and mitigating any adverseeffects which may be important to this State.'' Another coastal State noted:``We feel the two stage process of general regulations then permit specificterms, conditions and restrictions, (is) a safe route to take given theuncertainty of technologies and environmental concerns to be applied.''In contrast to the above reactions, there were a number of comments expressingconcern over what was perceived to be a dearth of environmental guidelines,particularly given the infancy of the industry and technology and a relativelack of environmental knowledge of the deep sea environment. Highlightsof these comments are: (1) Considering the lack of information of the deepsea environment, NOAA should undertake an expanded program of environmentalassessment, that focuses on information needed to develop responsible regulatoryrequirements; (2) the regulatory process relies on after-the-fact monitoringto develop the information needed to assess adverse impacts, and then failsto provide assurance that this information will be used to modify permitsso that harmful practices are stopped or mitigated; (3) there is a presumptionthat there will be no significant adverse environmental effects; (4) theenvironmental information available from monitoring will be available onlyafter adverse effects have already occurred; and (5) the 20-year durationof a permit is too long, given the relative lack of information on thedeep sea environment. As explained below, certain changes have been made in these final regulationsto clarify the environmental requirements. All the changes were proposedin the September 1987 supplemental proposed rule. NOAA full well realizes the relative lack of information on the deep seaenvironment and has continued to pursue a research program to fill themajor gaps. Presently, this research is focussed on the benthic impactsdue to the sedimentation of particulate material suspended by a miningcollector device or discharged as a benthic plume. NOAA is also investigatingthe possibility of conducting some environmental studies during the testof mining equipment in the next several years involving cooperation withother nations. Given the present state of the metals market and the negativeinfluence this has had on commercial deep seabed mining plans, some ofthe results of these research efforts should be available before NOAA receivesa permit application. <T3>Criteria for Determination of Significant Adverse Effects._</T3>Thepermit regulations have a new andSection; 971.601_Environmental requirements,that was set forth in NOAA's supplemental proposed rule and that explicitlynotes the environmental requirements which the Administrator must addressin issuing a permit. These requirements are based on there being sufficientenvironmental information to make a determination that either: (1) Theissuance of a permit cannot reasonably be expected to result in a ``significantadverse environmental effect''; or (2) If there is insufficient informationto make a determination on this question, no ``irreparable harm'' willcome to the environment during a period when monitoring of commercial recoveryis undertaken to further examine the significant adverse effects issue.This part of andSection; 971.601 is patterned after the Ocean Discharge Criteriaof the Clean Water Act regulations. However, NOAA will examine any perturbationto the environment caused by the issuance of a permit regardless of whetheror not a particular mining system creates a discharge. Subsection 971.601(b)requires the applicant to have an approved monitoring plan (andSection; 971.603)and the resources and other capabilities to implement it (as required inandSection;andSection; 971.201 and 971.202(b)(1)). As part of this structure,in the regulations, andSection; 971.101_Definitions, new terms ``significantadverse environmental effect'' as well as ``irreparable harm'' have beendefined, again using the pattern of the Ocean Discharge Criteria. New andSection;971.602_Significant adverse environmental effects, includes in subsection(b) a cross-reference to the criteria in andSection; 971.601(a).The above changes will reasonably negate the possibility of ``irreparableharm'' occurring to the environment in the event of there being insufficientinformation to decide on the question of ``significant adverse environmentaleffect,'' and monitoring is used to further examine this issue. Furthermore,andSection;971.406 has been modified to note that if a permit is grantedunder this scenario, it will be subject to modification, suspension orrevocation if a significant adverse environmental effect is revealed bysuch monitoring. Also, andSection;971.417(h) specifies, as authorized inthe Act, that such suspension or modification may be required immediatelyif necessary to prevent a significant adverse environmental effect. Thus,although a permit under such a scenario would still be issued for 20 years(a statutory requirement, see earlier discussion on duration of a permit),the effective period could be less in the event of the appearance of asignificant adverse environmental effect that cannot be mitigated. NOAA believes that adequate protection is being provided to the environmentwith the above noted changes and with the definitions of ``significantadverse environmental effect'' and ``irreparable harm'' (andSection;971.101).<T3>Environmental Requirements.</T3>_One commenter, while generally agreeingwith the approach in the supplemental proposal, suggested that new andSection;971.601(a)be revised to clarify that ongoing monitoring is intended to gather sufficientinformation ``in order to determine the potential for or occurrence ofany significant adverse environmental effect.'' This suggestion has beenincorporated. Another commenter, while agreeing with modelling these provisions afterEPA's Ocean Discharge Criteria, expressed the opinion that the EPA criteriashould not be considered an ideal model, in that using such criteria forgeneral NPDES permits can result in inadequate information with respectto site-specific effects. However, this concern should not affect NOAA'sapproach for its own permits. A NOAA permit is not general but is onlysite-specific. NOAA believes that the articulated criteria in andSection;971.601are adequate for judging case-by-case, site-specific effects. Also, NOAA'sinitial determinations will continue to be checked for verification afterpermit issuance_not only through prescribed monitoring by the permitteebut also by continuing research. A commenter suggested that NOAA emphasize more the results of environmentalstudy it has already accomplished in considering environmental criteria.NOAA intended that the factors or criteria set forth in the regulationsbe addressed within the context of accomplished studies, since they alreadyhave been addressed at the programmatic level in NOAA's programmatic EIS.In addition, a related section (andSection;971.204(b)) highlights that, inpreparing the EIS for assessing the environmental effects relating to eachpermit, the Administrator will utilize existing information. Another commenter expressed a preference for a ```go-slow' and monitorapproach'' in lieu of the proposed irreparable harm procedure, since itwas unclear to him how NOAA could make a reasoned ``irreparable harm''determination. This commenter's approach in essence would be the same asoriginally proposed by NOAA. However, other commenters have stressed thatgreater specificity in the form of criteria was needed_which led to thelatest approach that NOAA believes is responsive to earlier comments, isresponsible and is manageable. Virtually all other commenters either explicitlysupport the current approach or have not objected to it. <T3>Significant Adverse Environmental Effects.</T3>_One commenter suggestedthat andSection;971.602(b) should cross reference andSection;971.601(a) toclarify that environmental effects determinations will consider informationreflected in the criteria listed in the previous section. A cross referenceto andSection;971.601(a) has been added. <T3>At-sea Monitoring.</T3>_Even though the proposed regulations on whichcomments were taken pertained solely to the issuance of permits, one commenternoted that NOAA's regulations for exploration licenses do not require companiesto conduct monitoring unless they engage in at-sea mining tests. This commenterfelt that, ``while pre-systems test activities should not require extensivemonitoring, some specified level of effort by the licensee would provideevolving information on deep ocean processes and the benthic communityand thereby enhance the prospects of effective monitoring during commercialrecovery phases when such data become even more crucial.'' Although the exploration regulations distinguish between activities withno significant impact (not requiring monitoring) and activities, such asmining system tests, with potential impact (requiring monitoring), NOAAlicense TCRs are more detailed and recognize an intermediate spectrum ofactivities which could require monitoring. As a result, there is at leastthe potential for the gathering of additional environmental data, on thepart of exploration licensees, even if no mining system tests are conducted.The above commenter did note that, with respect to the proposed rule, theysupport NOAA's monitoring requirements. However, they further note thatsuch monitoring is intended to assist NOAA in determining the existenceof or potential for ``significant adverse impacts'' on the environmentand that without a definition of such, the value of monitoring would bediminished. This concern has now been addressed with the new provisionsexplained above. One commenter requested that NOAA produce a public field report on resultsof the monitoring program and observations. It is expected that full-scalemonitoring will provide NOAA with much useful information in order to evaluatethe TCRs, and develop possible mitigation measures. NOAA also recognizesthat an observer, in performance of his duties on-board a mining vessel,will have access to information which the licensee/permittee considersto be proprietary. NOAA will protect such information in accordance withapplicable law. There are no provisions or resources for publication ofmonitoring reports in entirety; however, the environmental aspects willbe made public. With the exception of proprietary data, materials relevantto any of these actions will be available for public inspection in theOcean Minerals and Energy Division office. Another commenter noted that the costs of the monitoring requirements shouldbe borne by the government. However, the Act requires licensees and permitteesto monitor the environmental effects of their activities in accordancewith guidelines issued by the Administrator. Another commenter noted that ``perhaps additional emphasis could be placedon fisheries issues.'' In response to this, under andSection; 971.603(e)(2),the phrase ``including commercially and recreationally valuable fish''has been added after ``behavior of biota''.The EPA, as a commenter, noted that they ``will have to address environmentalimpacts and monitoring of the surface and subsurface discharges in issuingany NPDES permit, including any necessary requirements under section 403(c)of the Clean Water Act (CWA).'' In this context, EPA further noted thatthey will have to make determinations related to ``no unreasonable degradation''and ``irreparable harm.'' They also suggested a revision to andSection; 971.602(a),now andSection; 971.603(a), to reflect ``that monitoring requirements areto ensure early and accurate detection of environmental changes so as toprevent the occurrence of significant adverse effects from commercial recoveryactivities.'' In response to this latter point, NOAA did modify the sectionin question so as to state (andSection; 971.603(a)):<ITAG tagnum="21">An applicant must submit with its application a monitoring plan designedto enable the Administrator to assess environmental impacts and to developand evaluate possible methods of mitigating adverse environmental effects,to validate assessments made in the EIS, and to ensure compliance withthe environmental protection requirements of this part.</ITAG>In response to EPA's other comments concerning unreasonable degradationand irreparable harm, the new definitions and the new andSection; 971.601_Environmentalrequirements, are quite compatible with the needs of EPA under the NPDESsystem and the Ocean Discharge Criteria. In addition, NOAA has refinedthe monitoring parameters listed in andSection; 971.603(e), in order to providegreater compatibility with NPDES monitoring and to provide greater precisionto the parameters. One commenter recommended that miners should be called on to monitor thephysical, local effects of mining, while further long term studies shouldbe undertaken by NOAA. This commenter also observed that the monitoringproposed seems to be unlimited. NOAA believes that although andSection; 971.603calls for monitoring to include biological effects, that section also clarifiesthat the scope of such monitoring is focused or limited. The overall purposesof monitoring initially set out in the section provide this focus, e.g.,monitoring should provide enough information to validate assessments madein the EIS. Another commenter suggested that a third party, similar to the NationalAcademy of Sciences, could provide monitors and develop a technical guidancedocument that could be available for public comment. The Act and NOAA'sregulations specify that Federal observers be Federal officers or employees,but this would allow the discretion to include any persons in this category,including personnel other than NOAA employees. With respect to public reviewof guidance documents, NOAA's regulations and EIS's have always been thesubject of and have benefited from public contribution. Public review wouldcontinue under the rules for such purposes as review of future applicationsand monitoring plans. The same commenter also proposed a one-year moratoriumon mining operations to allow additional environmental assessment. Thiswould be unnecessary, however, since no commercial recovery under the Actis planned or possible for over one year. With respect to NOAA's proposal for selection of impact and preservationalreference areas as part of a monitoring plan, two commenters, while supportingthis approach, went on to suggest that NOAA should proceed with establishingcriteria for such areas. NOAA has concluded that it is possible and appropriateto clarify the criteria in these rules, i.e., that each area should berepresentative of characteristics of the permittee's site_and has addedthis to andSection; 971.603(c). One of these commenters also proposed that designation of reference areasshould be prior to issuance of a commercial recovery permit. NOAA believesthat selection of such areas could precede a permit application, but thatthe designation would be provisional and would not become permanent untilthe permit and the approved monitoring plan associated with it have beenissued. The regulations now clarify that this may be done. One commenter urged that the regulations not allow the use of joint impactreference areas, since it could be difficult to trace an impact to a specificrecovery process. However, another commenter suggested there may be a strongcase, based on factors of efficiency, effectiveness and economy, for consolidatingreference areas. NOAA has concluded that, although some situations maybe inappropriate for joint impact reference areas, other situations maybe appropriate and even advantageous (e.g., by coincidence of mine sitecharacteristics, or for benefits from more efficient monitoring effortsthat produce more information). Thus, the regulations should not undulylimit flexibility by prohibiting the possibility of joint areas.A commenter expressed concern over environmental reference areas involvingareas outside permit areas. Another commenter urged that any monitoringoutside a permittee's mine site be qualified to cover only areas, and onlysuch period of time, for which the Administrator determines that the permitactivity has the potential to cause significant adverse environmental effector irreparable harm in the outside area. Still another commenter suggestedthat reasonable limits should be placed on any external monitoring, andthat such limits should be weighed against reasonable expectations regardingpotential adverse environmental effects. With respect to monitoring outsidespecific reference areas, andSection; 971.603(c) is explicitly limited toprescribe such reference areas only within permit areas. This reflectsa limitation on the comparable but separate concept in section 109(f) ofthe Act which provides for international negotiations to establish internationalareas in the deep seabed as stable reference areas. As for monitoring outsidea permit area generally, if this were deemed necessary, NOAA believes itis appropriate to set reasonable limits on such monitoring. Therefore,andSection; 971.603(f) has been refined to clarify that such external monitoringwould occur where the proposed activities have the potential to cause significantadverse environmental effect or irreparable harm in the outside area.One commenter stressed the need for minimizing if not eliminating the subjectiveelement in assessing the activities under a monitoring program, and thereforesuggested that whenever a work plan is approved subject to a monitoringrequirement, the Administrator should define, to the maximum extent practicable,objective criteria which would trigger any requirement either to suspendoperations or to take appropriate mitigating measures. NOAA believes thisis a reasonable point and has refined andSection; 971.603(f) to call forTCRs to include the identification of activities which could trigger suspensionor modification requirements, or if necessary permit revocation.<T3>Best Available Technologies (BAT) and Mitigation._</T3>Although, asstated in proposed rule andSection; 971.603(b) [now andSection; 971.604(a)],NOAA is unable to define a specific technology(ies) as being the best availabletechnologies (BAT), several commenters urged NOAA to reconsider its position.For those mining systems requiring an NPDES permit, it was pointed outthat EPA will have to require the use of Best Conventional Pollutant ControlTechnology, assuming the mining discharge(s) are considered conventionalrather than toxic pollutants. Therefore, the applicant must address thematter in terms of the Clean Water Act. One commenter suggested that applicantsmight explain their use of BAT in the context of how other alternativeswere considered and rejected. Although NOAA continues to believe it isinappropriate to specify particular technologies as BAT, NOAA acknowledgesthe validity of some of the comments, and that the use of BAT is requiredby section 109(b) of the Act. Therefore, NOAA is clarifying this provisionin the regulations by adopting the approach utilized in implementationof the OCS Lands Act. Until NOAA is in a position to define performancestandards or specify particular equipment or procedures comprising BAT,interim process will be adopted. An applicant will have to submit the informationnecessary to demonstrate that the requirements of section 109(b) of theAct will be met. The information must include the alternatives consideredand the rationale supporting the selection process, including a discussionof the relative costs and benefits of the technologies considered.Closely related to the use of BAT is the concept of mitigation, a particularapproach to the avoidance of a potential problem. Three commenters recommendedthat mitigation measures be required. Another suggested the need for aplan that would describe how activities would be modified in the face ofa perceived adverse impact. NOAA believes it is premature to require mitigationbut agrees with the desirability of an applicant having to think abouta potential need to deal with a problem triggered by the surface dischargeof mining wastes. Accordingly, a requirement for a mitigation plan hasbeen added to andSection; 971.604(b).One commenter suggested that the proposal in andSection; 971.604(b) for anapplicant to have a mitigation plan, only for surface vessel ``discharges''that cause a significant adverse environmental effect, is too narrowlyfocused; that the mitigation plan provision should instead refer to ``activitiesauthorized under the permit.'' However, such a broadening in this instancewould expand the provision beyond the particular potential problem thatNOAA and others had identified, and which this provision was intended toaddress. At this point, NOAA has concluded there is insufficient justificationfor inserting any additional mitigation provision.The same commenter also supported the provision in andSection; 971.604(a)calling for an applicant to report on best available technologies and alternativesconsidered, and recommended that a similar analysis be included with subsequentreports, pursuant to andSection; 971.604(c), on those technological or operationalchanges that will increase or have unknown environmental effects. NOAAbelieves this is a useful point consistent with its obligations pertainingto best available technologies, and has incorporated such a provision inandSection; 971.604(c).<T3>Conditional Standards for Onshore Activities._</T3>While NOAA functionsas lead agency in preparation of the EIS, it is not within this agency'spurview to ``govern'' onshore activities nor to set ``conditional standards''for any State to issue a license or permit, as requested by one commenter.As standards and restrictions vary widely from State to State, NOAA hasemphasized the need for early consultation between the applicant and Stateand local governments, when more is known about processing techniques andthe location of processing facilities. While the final regulations havesubstantially highlighted State involvement in permitting, it should berecognized that setting (and meeting) the conditions of any State permitis a responsibility between applicant and State.<T3>Stable Reference Areas.</T3>_Comments received on the stable referencearea (SRA) concept were mainly concerned with urging NOAA to designatesome Impact Reference Areas (IRAs) and Preservational Reference Areas (PRAs)no later than the issuance of permits. One comment suggested that thisbe accomplished by NOAA stating in the regulations that the issuance ofa permit is contingent upon the simultaneous designation of IRAs and PRAs.Another comment urged NOAA to make a mandatory designation of interim PRAs,which could be eliminated once international reference areas were established,and to designate areas within the mine sites for impact reference. As discussedabove, a requirement has been added to new andSection; 971.603_At-sea monitoring,which requires the monitoring of benthic impact through the study of twotypes of area, each selected by the permittee in consultation with NOAA:(1) An IRA which will be located in a portion of a permit area tentativelyscheduled to be mined early; and (2) an interim PRA located in a portionof a permit area tentatively determined: to be non-mineable, not to bescheduled for mining during the commercial recovery plan, or to be scheduledfor mining late in the plan. Although the SRA provisions in the Act proposeareas outside those licensed or permitted, NOAA believes that the aboveapproach, which falls within NOAA's authority, is compatible with the purposeof the SRA concept.It was also recommended by one of the above commenters that instead ofjust reserving a subsection of the commercial regulations for SRAs, NOAAshould establish the framework for establishing criteria for identifyingboth IRAs and PRAs. Setting the framework in the final rules, it was thought,would encourage the international consultations with other nations whichare required by the Act. NOAA, however, feels that it is more appropriateto continue to reserve the subsection and delay establishing criteria untilthe completion of the NOAA-sponsored research which was recommended inthe 1984 National Research Council's report on deep seabed SRAs.<T3>Reclamation and Compensation._</T3>One commenter suggested that permitteesbe required to reclaim the seafloor following mining and that, further,permittees should compensate for environmental losses. The seafloor perturbationentails a scraping of the surface followed by a rain of fine sediment kickedup by the scraping action. Until more is learned about the nature and extentof impact on the benthic fauna, and their repopulation, NOAA believes thata reclamation requirement would be premature and could lead to as muchor more damage to the benthic fauna than from mining.The Act does not provide authority for compensation for the types of impactscharacterized in NOAA's PEIS. <ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart H_Miscellaneous</ITAG><T3>Records To Be Maintained by Licensees and Permittees._</T3>In accordancewith the Act, NOAA requires that records be maintained by each licenseeand permittee, which will fully disclose expenditures in the area underlicense or permit, and provide any other information to facilitate an effectiveaudit of these expenditures. The proposed regulations also incorporatedprovisions from the Act allowing Federal Government access to such records(andSection; 971.801(a)(2)). One commenter requested the specification thatsuch access be only upon a finding by the Administrator of good cause,in order to protest the licensee or permittee from unnecessary audits.NOAA had retained the statutory language, because it has concluded thatthe prescribed access provides for routine inspections carried out in aneutral fashion. These are a regular part of implementing a licensing program.Furthermore, NOAA believes the language itself limits the potential forabuse by requiring access to records which are ``necessary and directlypertinent'' to expenditure verification.<T3>Disclosure of Confidential and Proprietary Information._</T3>Two commentersrequested that NOAA make some provision in its regulations for releaseof confidential/proprietary data into the public domain. Under the provisionsof the Trade Secrets Act (18 U.S.C. 1905), NOAA is prohibited from unilateraldisclosure of any information or data that is commercially confidential,unless the applicant waives or withdraws the request for confidentiality,or specifies an expiration date at the time of submission of the data.NOAA's procedure for handling requests for disclosure of privileged informationfrom an applicant is outlined in andSection; 971.802 of these regulations.Certain time limits in andSection; 971.802(d) have been modified to conformto the Department of Commerce regulations implementing the Freedom of InformationAct (53 FR 6972).One commenter requested that procedures be defined so that affected Statesmay receive confidential information. While NOAA recognizes that affectedStates may require certain proprietary information from an applicant forpurposes of Federal consistency decisions under the Coastal Zone ManagementAct, these transactions are primarily between the applicant and the affectedState, and have been addressed in the regulations for Federal consistency,15 CFR Part 930. This perspective is reiterated in andSection; 971.802(g)of these regulations.<T3>Amendment to Regulations._</T3>One commenter proposed that NOAA shouldstate in the regulations that revision of the regulations will be accomplishedthrough formal rulemaking three years from their effective date in orderto take into account new information on environmental impact, technologicaldevelopment, conservation, etc. For the same reasons, the commenter alsoproposed subsequent periodic revisions, at least every three years, untilcommerical recovery is underway. Under the provisions of andSection; 971.804,NOAA may amend its regulations through formal rulemaking at any time theAdministrator determines it to be appropriate in order to provide for theconservation of natural resources, protection of the environment, or thesafety of life and property at sea. NOAA may periodically modify theserules for nonsubstantive purposes as well, such as conforming them to governingprocedures on public information. For example, these rules include technicalamendments to and consolidation with portions of 15 CFR Part 970, to whichno objections were made. In addition to referring to information submittedby licensees in their annual reports, NOAA has a continuing program ofenvironmental research and assessment in order to ensure that relevantdata are reflected in the TCRs of a license or permit. Any significantnew development which may affect the quality of the environment, conservation,or safety at sea, or new data resulting from mining activities under thelicense/permit may be the subject of amendment to the regulations or modificationto the TCRs. In addition, NOAA has a statutory requirement to submit abiennial report to Congress containing an evaluation of exploration andcommercial recovery activities, resource recovery and disposition, andan assessment of the environmental impacts, including any damage causedby any adverse effects, on the quality of the environment resulting frommining activities. In view of the extensive avenues for oversight of regulatoryeffectiveness and license/permit compliance, the initiation of additionalrulemaking, for which no requirement for revision may exist, appears excessiveto NOAA. <ITAG tagnum="81">Subpart J_Enforcement </ITAG><T3>Observers._</T3>Several commenters were concerned with the effectiveness,frequency and authority of Federal observers. One commenter favored minimizinginterference with mining activities. NOAA has already drafted andSection;971.1005 to assure this purpose. Another commenter favored expansion ofobserver authority to enforce immediate suspension of activities. Undersection 114 of the Act, the function of the Federal observer is to monitorand assess the effectiveness of the TCRs of the license or permit, andto report to the Administrator any infraction as appropriate. Licenseesand permittees are required to monitor environmental effects of their activitiesunder NOAA's guidelines. As discussed in the Notice of Proposed Rulemaking,NOAA will place Federal observers onboard mining ships to observe operations,collect additional data to improve estimates of environmental effects,test new or alternative methodologies or equipment for monitoring, andevaluate possible mitigation techniques. However, NOAA believes that toprovide for unilateral suspension of mining activities by a Federal observerwould constitute an unjustified expansion of an observer's authority. NOAAwishes to assure broader consideration prior to any suspension. In response to comment, language has been added to andSection; 971.1005 ofthe regulations for emplacement of an observer on each permittee's miningvessel(s) at least once during the initial year of commercial recoveryactivities. Such a requirement will ensure that NOAA is in a position tojudge the effectiveness of an operator's monitoring program. If problemsare observed in the technical ability to carry out an approved monitoringplan, NOAA will be able to take corrective measures. While NOAA intendsto observe operations on a random schedule during the life of a permit,this new requirement should increase public confidence in the ability ofoperators to monitor properly their activities. A commenter suggested that the regulations provide for appropriate Stateobservers if operations are taking place adjacent to a State EEZ. Thiscommenter also suggested strengthening the channel for State input to theAdministrator. As the State observers, it has been noted that section 114of the Act provides only for Federal officers or employees as observers.It should also be noted, however, that these regulations, like the Act,apply to minerals beyond any national jurisiction; these minerals thuscould not really be considered adjacent to any State of the United States.Nevertheless, NOAA would be prepared to cooperate with States on monitoringif a clear State interest were identified with respect to any particularactivities under a permit. As for strengthening channels for States' input,other sections of the regulations have been clarified to highlight opportunitiesfor consultation with States (e.g., andSection;andSection; 971.200(g), 971.212(b) and (d), 971.401 and 971.402). Other Comments <T3>Exploration._</T3>One commenter urged NOAA to amend the explorationlicense regulations to require applicants to provide information necessaryfor the Administrator to make findings relating to commercial recovery.NOAA believes that mineral exploration efforts so seldom involve any aspectof commercial operations that a requirement of this sort would place aburden on applicants that would generally never be used and, at best, wouldbe premature. <T3>Applicable Minerals._</T3>One question dealt with the categories ofminerals covered by the proposed regulations. The Act limits NOAA's authorityto nodules occuring on or just below the surface of the deep seabed andincluding one or more minerals, at least one of which contains manganese,nickel, cobalt, or copper. The nodules are most commonly termed, ``manganesenodules.'' <T3>Geographic Coverage of the Regulations._</T3>One commenter wonderedwhether the proposed regulations were intended to be restricted to theDeep Ocean Mining Environmental Study (DOMES) area or to additional areas.The area of jurisdiction of the Act, as set forth in section 4(4), is thatarea lying seaward of and outside_(A) the continental shelf of any nation;and (B) any area of national resource jurisdiction of any foreign nation,if such area extends beyond the continental shelf of such nation and suchjurisdiction is recognized by the United States. Therefore, the regulationsare applicable to, but are not restricted to, the DOMES area. <T3>Uniform Regulatory Regime.</T3>_Two commenters pointed out that whileNOAA regulates U.S. citizens engaged in exploration and commercial recoveryin the deep seabed, the U.S. Department of the Interior regulates similaractivities occuring on the U.S. continental shelf. They opined that a uniformregulatory regime would provide for uniform protection for other marineresources and would entail less duplication of services. NOAA believesthat it is not necessarily desirable for resources in international watersto be developed under regulations which are the same as for sovereign U.S.resources. However, many aspects of development are similar and, to thatextent, NOAA and the U.S. Department of the Interior will continue to shareinformation and ideas. <ITAG tagnum="84">Classification Under Executive Order 12291</ITAG>The NOAA Administrator considers these regulations to be major with respectto the criteria of Executive Order 12291 (E.O. 12291) of February 17, 1981,because they will foster and govern development of the United States deepseabed mining industry. As explained under ``Structure of the Regulations,''several provisions of the Act require identical or nearly identical responsesin each of two phases of deep seabed mining activity (exploration and commercialrecovery). As a result, NOAA is consolidating these portions of the regulations.Accordingly, these regulations will supercede Subparts, I, J, and K of15 CFR Part 970. NOAA has prepared and transmitted to the Office of Managementand Budget a regulatory impact analysis as specified by section 3 of E.O.12291. The Administrator of NOAA has determined that these rules are within theauthority delegated by law and consistent with Congressional intent. Theseregulations are promulgated pursuant to section 308 of the Act. Section308 requires the Administrator to issue regulations necessary and appropriateto implement the first three Titles of the Act. These Titles generallyrequire establishment by the Administrator, in accordance with the requirementsof the Act, of a regulatory program governing: application for, and issuanceof, deep seabed hard mineral resource exploration licenses and commercialrecovery permits (see, <T3>e.g.</T3>, section 102 of the Act); establishment of license and permitTCRs (section 105(b) and sections 108-112 of the Act); agency supervisionof conduct of activities authorized under licenses and permits (see, <T3>e.g.</T3>, sections 105(c), 106, 113, 114 and 308(c)); and enforcement(Title III).In 1981, NOAA issued regulations pertaining to exploration (15 CFR Part970). At that time NOAA also issued a Programmatic Environmental ImpactStatement (September 1981) which contemplated subsequent issuance of commercialrecovery regulations. These final regulations complete the process of establishingthe regulatory regime by which U.S. citizens may apply for permits andconduct commercial recovery under the Act, and are clearly authorized bythe Act. The regulations are also consistent with Congressional intent. The majorCongressional objective in enacting the Act was to encourage potentialinvestment in deep seabed mining by establishing a regulatory regime underwhich U.S. citizens, could, with reasonable certainty and security, exercisethe high seas freedom to engage in exploration for, and commercial recoveryof, these hard mineral resources. (Sections 2(a)(11-14), 2(a)(16) and 2(b)(3).)Congress was also concerned that the regime be consistent with internationallaw and encourage resource conservation, protect the environment and promotesafety to life and property at sea. (Section 2(b)(4).) The Act containsdetailed permit application and issuance provisions designed to accommodatesand balance these objectives, and also provisions which authorize agencyaction to provide for future contingencies with regard to the concernsabove. (See, <T3>e.g.</T3>, Sections 105(c) and 308 regarding post-permit issuance TCRand regulation revision, and section 106 regarding modification, suspensionand revocation.) The final regulations adhere closely to the provisionsof the Act. The regulations also recognize, as did Congress, that miningtechnology, environmental assessment information and other factors relevantto commercial recovery under the Act would develop and change over time.The regulations are therefore generally designed to give permit applicantsflexibility in the manner in which they meet the requirements of the Act,subject to the Act's specific requirements and to NOAA's continuing authorityto act in the event that subsequent developments affect environmental,international or other concerns of the Act. As indicated in the ``PublicComment Opportunities'' section of the preamble and in the responses tospecific comments, there have been many opportunities for public commenton these regulations, and most commenters generally support the basic approachtaken in the regulations to implementation of the Act. Specific issueshave been addressed with reference to the Congressional objectives outlinedand those expressed in the provisions of the Act itself. Consequently,the Administrator has determined that the requirements of E.O. 12291(4)(a)have been met. <ITAG tagnum="84">Regulatory Impact Analysis </ITAG>NOAA has prepared a regulatory impact analysis on these regulations. Thisanalysis, which examines the potential impact of the proposed regulations,is available to all interested parties. The analysis examines the variousalternatives NOAA considered as it addressed the major issues in the regulations,including alternatives advocated by interest groups; considers benefitand cost implications of the alternatives; and explains NOAA's reasonsfor making the choices reflected in these regulations. The analysis includesdiscussion of regulatory flexibility in compliance with the RegulatoryFlexibility Act, Pub. L. 96-354. <ITAG tagnum="84">Summary of Discussion Related to Regulatory Flexibility</ITAG>Because of the large scale and costs of deep seabed mining operations,the primary involvement of small business concerns in this industry isexpected to be as contractors or subcontractors, rather than as sole ownersor operators. Only one permit, obtained by the overall operator, is required.The general regulatory approach selected by NOAA for these regulationswas designed to provide the greatest flexibility for, and to minimize anyadverse economic impact on any entity_large or small_which may be involvedin deep seabed mining development. The regulations do not impose any reporting,recordkeeping, or other compliance requirements on small governmental jurisdictionsor small organizations. Copies of the regulatory impact analysis, whichcontains a discussion related to regulatory flexibility, may be obtainedby writing to NOAA, Chief, Ocean Minerals and Energy Division, at the addressspecified in the ADDRESSES section of this rulemaking.<ITAG tagnum="84">Paperwork Reduction Act, Public Law 96-511</ITAG>Pursuant to the requirements of the Paperwork Reduction Act NOAA has evaluatedthe paperwork requirements incurred through compliance with the regulationsfor the issuance and maintenance of commercial recovery permits. The paperworkresulting from most of the regulatory provisions, especially those dealingwith the application process, consists largely of information generatedby industry in the pursuit of financial assistance and general managementand entails little or no additional paperwork than would otherwise be necessaryin conducting deep seabed operations. The balance of paperwork resultsfrom environmental monitoring which will be the direct result of implementationof the Act through regulatory measures. The data gathered are only thosenecessary for compliance with the statutory mandate.Since application for commercial permitting has not occurred and is notlikely to occur until the end of the exploration phase_in 1994_NOAA, inconsultation with representatives of industry and OMB, initially has projectedone burden hour for the collection, which number would be used until experienceindicates a better estimate. Subsequent to the above initial consultations,in the July 1986 proposed rules, industry as well as the rest of the publicwere specifically invited to comment on the information collection requirementsof the rule. No further comments on this particular issue were received.The information collection requirements contained in this regulation havebeen approved by the Office of Management and Budget (OMB) under ControlNo. 0648-0170.Public reporting burden for this collection of information is estimatedto average one hour per response, including the time for reviewing instructions,searching existing data sources, gathering and maintaining the data needed,and completing and reviewing the collection of information. Send commentsregarding this burden estimate or any other aspect of this collection ofinformation, including suggestions for reducing this burden, to John Padan,NOAA, 1825 Connecticut Avenue, NW., Suite 710, Washington, DC 20235; andto the Office of Information and Regulatory Affairs, ATTN: Desk Officerfor NOAA, Office of Management and Budget, Washington, DC 20503.<ITAG tagnum="84">Environmental Assessment</ITAG>Pursuant to section 109(c) of the Act and the National Environmental PolicyAct of 1969, NOAA has prepared a final programmatic environmental impactstatement (PEIS) assessing the environmental impacts of commercial recoveryin the area of the oceans in which such activities by any United Statescitizen will likely first occur under the authority of the Act. The PEISwas filed with the Environmental Protection Agency in September 1981. Copiesmay be obtained by writing NOAA, Chief, Ocean Minerals and Energy Division,at the address specified in the ADDRESSES section of this rulemaking. NOAAhas also prepared an environmental assessment (EA) which updates the PEISand which confirms a finding of no significant impact on the quality ofthe human environment from the promulgation of these regulations. The EAis available at the above location for review upon request.<ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects in 15 CFR Parts 970 and 971</ITAG>Administrative practice and procedures, Environmental protection, Marineresources, Marine safety, Reporting requirements, Seabed mining.Accordingly, it is proposed to add new Part 971 and amend Part 970 to 15CFR Chapter IX, Subchapter D, as follows.<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: December 6, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">William E. Evans,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Under Secretary, NOAA.     </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 971_DEEP SEABED MINING REGULATIONS FOR COMMERCIAL RECOVERY PERMITS</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.100 Purpose.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.101 Definitions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.102 Nature of permits.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.103 Prohibited activities and restrictions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.104 OMB Control Number.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart B_Applications</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.200 General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Contents</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.201 Statement of financial resources.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.202 Statement of technological experience and capabilities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.203 Commercial recovery plan.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.204 Environmental and use conflict analysis.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.205 Vessel safety and documentation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.206 Statement of ownership.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.207 Antitrust information.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.208 Fee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.209 Processing outside the United States.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Procedures</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.210 Determination whether application is complete for furtherprocessing.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.211 Consultation and cooperation with Federal agencies.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.212 Public notice, hearing and comment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.213 Amendment to an application.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.214 Consolidated license and permit procedures. [Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart C_Certification of Applications</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.300 General.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.301 Required findings.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.302 Denial of certification.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.303 Notice of certification.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart D_Issuance/Transfer: Terms, Conditions and Restrictions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.400 General.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Issuance/Transfer; Modification/Revision; Suspension/Revocation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.401 Proposal to issue or transfer and proposed terms, conditionsand restrictions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.402 Consultation and cooperation with Federal and State agencies.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.403 Freedom of the high seas.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.404 International obligations of the United States.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.405 Breach of international peace and security involving armedconflict.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.406 Environmental effects.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.407 Safety at sea.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.408 Processing outside the United States.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.409 Denial of issuance or transfer.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.410 Notice of issuance or transfer.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.411 Objections to terms, conditions and restrictions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.412 Changes in permits and permit terms, conditions, and restrictions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.413 Revision of a permit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.414 Modification of permit terms, conditions and restrictions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.415 Duration of a permit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.416 Approval of permit transfers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.417 Suspension or modification of activities; suspension or revocationof permits.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Terms, Conditions and Restrictions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.418 Diligence requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.419 Environmental protection requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.420 Resource conservation requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.421 Freedom of the high seas requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.422 Safety at sea requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.423 Best available technology.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.424 Monitoring requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.425 Changes of circumstances.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.426 Annual report and records maintenance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.427 Processing outside the United States.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.428 Other necessary permits.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.429 Special terms, conditions and restrictions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.430 Other Federal requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart E_Resource Development</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.500 General.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.501 Resource assessment, recovery plan, and logical mining unit.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.502 Conservation of resources.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.503 Diligent commercial recovery.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart F_Environmental Effects</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.600 General.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.601 Environmental requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.602 Significant adverse environmental effects.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.603 At-sea monitoring.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.604 Best available technologies (BAT) and mitigation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.605 Stable references areas. [Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.606 Onshore information.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart G_Safety of Life and Property at Sea</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.700 General.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.701 Criteria for safety of life and property at sea.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart H_Miscellaneous</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.800 General.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.801 Records to be maintained and information to be submitted bylicensees and permittees.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.802 Public disclosure of documents received by NOAA.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.803 Relinquishment and surrender of licenses and permits.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.804 Amendment to regulations for conservation, protection of theenvironment, and safety of life and property at sea.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.805 Computation of time.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart I_Uniform Procedures</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.900 Applicability.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.901 Formal hearing procedures.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart J_Enforcement</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.1000 General.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.1001 Assessment procedure.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.1002 Hearing and appeal procedures.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.1003 Permit sanctions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.1004 Remission or mitigation of forfeitures.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.1005 Observers.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.1006 Proprietary enforcement information.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">971.1007 Advance notice of civil actions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>30 U.S.C. 1401 <T3>et seq.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart A_General</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;971.100</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Purpose.   </ITAG>The purpose of this part is to implement the responsibilities and authoritiesof the Administrator of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration(NOAA) pursuant to Pub. L. 96-283, the Deep Seabed Hard Mineral ResourcesAct (the Act), to issue to eligible United States citizens permits forthe commercial recovery of deep seabed hard minerals.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.101</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Definitions.</ITAG>For purposes of this part, the term(a) ``Act'' means the Deep Seabed Hard Mineral Resources Act (Pub. L. 96-283;94 Stat. 553; 30 U.S.C. 1401 <T3>et seq.</T3>); (b) ``Administrator'' means the Administrator of the National Oceanic andAtmospheric Administration, or the Administrator's designee; (c) ``Affected State'' means any State with a coastal zone management programapproved under Section 306 of the Coastal Zone Management Act, as amended,where coastal zone land and water uses are affected by the issuance ofa commercial recovery permit under the provisions of the Act or this part;(d) ``Applicant'' means an applicant for a commercial recovery permit pursuantto the Act and this part; as used in subparts H, I and J of this part,``applicant'' also means an applicant for an exploration license pursuantto the Act and Part 970 of the title. ``Applicant'' also means a proposedpermit transferee;(e) ``Commercial recovery'' means_(1) Any activity engaged in at sea to recover any hard mineral resourceat a substantial rate for the primary purpose of marketing or commerciallyusing such resource to earn a net profit, whether or not such net profitis actually earned; (2) If such recovered hard mineral resource will be processed at sea, suchprocessing; and(3) If the waste of such activity to recover any hard mineral resource,or of such processing at sea, will be disposed of at sea, such disposal;(f) ``Continental Shelf'' means_(1) The seabed and subsoil of the submarine areas adjacent to the coast,but outside the area of the territorial sea, to a depth of 200 meters or,beyond that limit to where the depth of the superjacent waters admits ofthe exploitation of the natural resources of such submarine area; and(2) The seabed and subsoil of similar submarine areas adjacent to the coastof islands;(g) ``Controlling interest'', for purposes of paragraph (v)(3) of thissection, means a direct or indirect legal or beneficial interest in orinfluence over another person arising through ownership of capital stock,interlocking directorates or officers, contractual relations, or othersimilar means, which substantially affect the independent business behaviorof such person;(h) ``Deep seabed'' means the seabed, and the subsoil thereof to a depthof ten meters, lying seaward of and outside_(1) The Continental Shelf of any nation; and(2) Any area of national resource jurisdiction of any foreign nation, ifsuch area extends beyond the Continental Shelf of such nation and suchjurisdiction is recognized by the United States;(i) ``Environment'' or ``environmental'' as used in the definitions of``irreparable harm'' and ``significant adverse environmental effect'' meansor pertains to the deep seabed and ocean waters lying at and within thepermit area, and in surrounding areas including transportation corridorsto the extent that they might be affected by the commercial recovery activities,and the living and non-living resources of those areas;(j) ``Exploration'' means_(1) Any at-sea observation and evaluation activity which has, as its objective,the establishment and documentation of_(i) The nature, shape, concentration, location, and tenor of a hard mineralresource; and(ii) The environmental, technical, and other appropriate factors whichmust be taken into account to achieve commercial recovery; and(2) The taking from the deep seabed of such quantities of any hard mineralresource as are necessary for the design, fabrication and testing of equipmentwhich is intended to be used in the commercial recovery and processingof such resource;(k) ``Hard mineral resource'' means any deposit or accretion on, or justbelow, the surface of the deep seabed of nodules which include one or moreminerals, at least one of which is manganese, nickel, cobalt, or copper;(l) ``Irreparable harm'' means significant undesirable effects to the environmentoccurring after the date of the permit issuance which will not be reversedafter cessation or modification of the activities authorized under thepermit(m) ``Licensee'' means the holder of a license issued under NOAA regulationsto engage in exploration;(n) ``NOAA'' means the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration;(o) ``Permittee'' means the holder of a permit issued or transferred underthis part to engage in commercial recovery;(p) ``Person'' means any United States citizen, any individual, and anycorporation, partnership, joint venture, association, or other entity organizedor existing under the laws of any nation;(q) ``Reciprocating state'' means any foreign nation designated as suchby the Administrator under section 118 of the Act;(r) ``Recovery plan'' or ``commercial recovery plan'' means the plan submittedby an applicant for a commercial recovery permit pursuant to andSection;971.203;(s) ``Significant adverse environmental effect'' means: (1) important adversechanges in ecosystem diversity, productivity, or stability of the biologicalcommunities within the environment; (2) threat to human health throughdirect exposure to pollutants or through consumption of exposed aquaticorganisms; or (3) important loss of aesthetic, recreational, scientificor economic values;(t) ``State agency'' means the agency responsible for implementing theresponsibilities of Section 306(c)(5) under the Coastal Zone ManagementAct, as amended, and 15 CFR Part 930;(u) ``United States'' means the several States, the District of Columbia,the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, American Samoa, the United States VirginIslands, Guam, and any other Commonwealth, territory, or possession ofthe United States; and(v) ``United States citizen'' means_(1) Any individual who is a citizen of the United States;(2) Any corporation, partnership, joint venture, association, or otherentity organized or existing under the laws of any of the United States;and(3) Any corporation, partnership, joint venture, association, or otherentity (whether organized or existing under the laws of any of the UnitedStates or a foreign nation) if the controlling interest in such entityis held by an individual or entity described in paragraph (v)(1) or (v)(2).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;971.102</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Nature of permits.</ITAG>(a) A permit issued under this part authorizes the holder thereof to engagein commercial recovery within a specific portion of the sea floor consistentwith the provisions of the Act and this part and consistent with the specificterms, conditions, and restrictions (TCRs) applied to the permit by theAdministrator.(b) A permit issued under this part is exclusive with respect to the holderthereof as against any other United States citizen or any citizen, nationalor governmental agency of, or any legal entity organized or existing underthe laws of, any reciprocating state.(c) A valid existing license under 15 CFR Part 970 will entitle the holder,if otherwise eligible under the provisions of the Act and implementingregulations, to a permit for commercial recovery from an area selectedfrom within the license area. Such a permit will recognize the right ofthe holder to recover hard mineral resources, and to own, tranport, use,and sell hard mineral resources recovered under the permit and in accordancewith the requirements of the Act and this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;971.103</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Prohibited activities and restrictions.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Prohibited activities and exceptions.</T3>(1) No United States citizen may engage in any commercial recovery unlessauthorized to do so under_(i) A permit issued pursuant to the Act and implementing regulations;(ii) A license, permit or equivalent authorization issued by a reciprocatingstate; or(iii) An international agreement which is in force with respect to theUnited States.(2) The prohibitions of paragraph (a)(1) of this section do not apply toany of the following activities:(i) Scientific research, including that concerning hard mineral resources;(ii) Mapping, or the taking of any geophysical, geochemical, oceanographic,or atmospheric measurements or random bottom samplings of the deep seabed,if such taking does not significantly alter the surface or subsurface ofthe seabed or significantly affect the environment;(iii) The design, construction, or testing of equipment and facilitieswhich will or may be used for exploration or commercial recovery, if suchdesign, construction or testing is conducted onshore, or does not involvethe recovery of any but incidental hard mineral resources;(iv) The furnishing of machinery, products, supplies, services, or materialsfor any exploration or commercial recovery conducted under a license orpermit issued under the Act and implementing regulations, a license orpermit or equivalent authorization issued by a reciprocating state, orany relevant international agreement; and(v) Activities, other than exploration or commercial recovery activities,of the Federal Government.(3) No United States citizen may interfere or participate in interferencewith any activity conducted by any permittee which is authorized to beundertaken under a permit issued by the Administrator to a permittee underthe Act or with any activity conducted by the holder of, and authorizedto be undertaken under, a license or permit or equivalent authorizationissued by a reciprocating state for the commercial recovery of hard mineralresources. For purposes of this section, interference includes physicalinterference with activities authorized by the Act, this part, and a licenseor permit issued pursuant thereto; the filing of a specious claim in theUnited States or any other nation; and any other activity designed to harass,or which has the effect of harassing, persons conducting deep seabed miningactivities authorized by law. Interference does not include the exerciseof any superior rights granted to United States citizens by the Constitutionof the United States, or any Federal or State law, treaty, or agreementor regulation promulgated pursuant thereto.(4) United States citizens shall exercise their rights on the high seaswith reasonable regard for the interests of other states in their exerciseof the freedoms of the high seas.(b) <T3>Restrictions on issuance of permits.</T3> The Administrator will notissue any permit_(1) After the date on which any relevant international agreement is ratifiedby and enters into force with respect to the United States, except to theextent that issuance of the permit is not inconsistent with that agreement.(2) The recovery plan of which, submitted pursuant to the Act and implementingregulations, would apply to an area to which applies, or would conflictwith:(i) Any exploration plan or recovery plan submitted with any pending applicationto which priority of right for issuance applies under 15 CFR Part 970 orthis part;(ii) Any exploration plan or recovery plan associated with any existinglicense or permit; or(iii) An equivalent authorization which has been issued, or for which formalnotice of application has been submitted, by a reciprocating state priorto the filing date of any relevant application for licenses or permitspursuant to the Act and implementing regulations;(3) Authorizing commercial recovery within any area of the deep seabedin which exploration is authorized under a valid existing license if suchpermit is issued to a person other than the licensee for such area;(4) Which authorizes commercial recovery to commence before January 1,1988;(5) The recovery plan for which applies to any area of the deep seabedif, within the 3-year period before the date of application for that permit:(i) The applicant therefor surrendered or relinquished such area underan exploration plan or recovery plan associated with a previous licenseor permit issued to such applicant; or (ii) A permit previously issued to the applicant had an exploration planor recovery plan which applied to such area and such license or permitwas revoked under section 106 of the Act; (6) Or approve the transfer of a permit, except to a United States citizen;or(7) That would authorize commercial recovery activities in an area otherthan for which the applicant therefore holds a valid exploration licenseunder part 970 of this title.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.104 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">OMB control number.</ITAG>The information collection requirements and reporting and recordkeepingrequirements contained in this part were approved by the Office of Managementand Budget under control number 0648-0170.<ITAG tagnum="84">Subpart B_Applications</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.200</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Who may apply; how. </T3>Any United States citizen holding a validexploration license may apply to the Administrator for issuance of a commercialrecovery permit for all or part of the area to which the license applies.Any holder of a commercial recovery permit may apply to the Administratorfor transfer of the permit. Applications must be submitted in the formand manner described in this subpart.(b) <T3>Place, form and copies.</T3> An application for the issuance or transferof a commerical recovery permit must be in writing, verified and signedby an authorized officer or other authorized representative of the applicant.The application and 25 copies thereof must be submitted to:<ITAG tagnum="26">Ocean Minerals and Energy Division, Office of Ocean and Coatal ResourceManagement, National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration, Suite 710,1825 Connecticut Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20235.</ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">The Administrator may waive in whole or in part, at his discretion,the requirement that 25 copies of an application be filed with NOAA.(c) <T3>General contents.</T3> The application must contain a proposed commericalrecovery plan and the financial, technical, environmental and other informationspecified in this part, which in total are necessary for the Administratorto make the determinations required by the Act and this part. Althoughthe ultimate standards for determinations under these rules are identicalfor both transferees and original preexisting licensees, NOAA anticipatesthat applicants who are transferees will have to supply more informationwith the application than licensees will [see subsection (e) in this section].(d) <T3>Identification of requirements.</T3> Each portion of the applicationshould identify the requirements of this part to which it responds.(e) <T3>Information previously submitted in connection with an explorationlicense.</T3> Information previously submitted as part of an explorationlicense application, as well as information submitted during the courseof license activities (such as data included in annual reports to NOAA),may be incorporated in the commercial recovery permit application by reference.(f) <T3>Request for confidential treatment of information.</T3> If an applicantwishes to have any information in its application not be subject to publicdisclosure, it must so request, at the time of submitting the information,pursuant to andSection; 971.802 which will govern disposition of the request.(g) <T3>Pre-application consultation.</T3> The Administrator will make NOAAstaff available to potential applicants for pre-application consultationson how to respond to the provisions of this part. In appropriate circumstances,the Administrator will provide written confirmation to the applicant oforal guidance resulting from such consultations. Such consultation is requiredfor the purpose of andSection; 971.207. The applicant is encouraged to consultwith affected States as early as is practicable [see also andSection;andSection;971.213 and 971.606(b)].(h) <T3>Compliance with Federal consistency requirements.</T3> An applicantfor a commercial recovery permit must comply with all necessary requirements,including procedures, pursuant to 15 CFR Part 930, Subpart D. Applicationsand other necessary data and information must be transmitted to the designatedState agency as prescribed under 15 CFR 930.50.<ITAG tagnum="84">Contents</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.201</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Statement of financial resources.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General.</T3> The application must contain information sufficient todemonstrate to the Administrator pursuant to andSection; 971.301 that, uponissuance or transfer of the permit, the applicant will have access to thefinancial resources to carry out, in accordance with this part, the commercialrecovery program set forth in the applicant's commercial recovery plan.(b) <T3>Specific.</T3> In particular, the information on financial resourcesis expected to be general in nature but must include the likely sourcesand timing of funds to meet the applicant's scheduled expenditures in therecovery plan. These sources may include cash flow, reserves, and outsidefunding.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;971.202 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Statement of technological experience and capabilities.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>The application must contain information sufficient todemonstrate to the Administrator pursuant to andSection;971.301 that, uponissuance or transfer of the permit, the applicant will have the technologicalcapability to carry out, in accordance with the regulations contained inthis part, the commercial recovery program set out in the applicant's commercialrecovery plan.(b) <T3>Specific. </T3>In particular, the information submitted pursuant tothis section must describe the equipment, knowledge, and skills the applicantpossesses, or to which it can demonstrate access [see andSection;971.200(e)].The information must include:(1) A description of the technology or the equipment and methods to beused by the applicant in carrying out each step in the mining process,including nodule collection, retrieval, transfer to ship, environmentalmonitoring, transport to processing facilities, nodule processing, wastedisposal and compliance with applicable water quality standards. The descriptionmust include:(i) An analysis of the performance of experimental systems, sub-systems,or analogous machinery;(ii) The rationale for extrapolating from test results to commercial mining.The more test data offered with the application the less analysis willbe expected; and(iii) Anticipated system reliability within the context of anticipatedproduction time lost through equipment failure.(2) A functional description of the types of technical persons on whomthe applicant will rely to operate its equipment.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;971.203 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Commercial recovery plan.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>The application must include a proposed commercial recoveryplan which describes the applicant's projected commercial recovery activities,in a general way, for the twenty year period to be covered by the proposedpermit. Although preliminary and subject to change, the plan must be moredetailed for that portion of the permit term leading up to the initiationof commercial recovery. The plan must include sufficient information forthe Administrator, pursuant to this part, to make the necessary determinationspertaining to the certification and issuance or transfer of a permit andto the development and enforcement of the TCRs for a permit.(b) <T3>Specific. </T3>The plan must include:(1) A description of the activities proposed to be carried out during theperiod of the permit;(2) The intended schedule of commercial recovery (see ``Diligent commercialrecovery,'' andSection;971.503);(3) Environmental safeguards and monitoring systems, which must take intoaccount requirements under Subpart F of this part, including best availabletechnologies (BAT) (andSection;971.604) and monitoring (andSection;971.603);(4) Details of the area or areas proposed for commercial recovery, whichmeet requirements for diligence (andSection;971.503) and conservation ofresources pursuant to Subpart E (especially andSection;971.502);(5) A resource assessment of the area or areas proposed for commercialrecovery which meets the requirements for resource assessment and logicalmining unit (andSection;971.501);(6) A description of the methods and technology to be used for commercialrecovery and processing (see andSection;971.202(b)(1)); and(7) The methods to be used for disposal of wastes from recovery and processing,including the areas for disposal and identification of any toxic substancesin wastes.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;971.204 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Environmental and use conflict analysis.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Environmental information submission. </T3>The application must besupported by sufficient marine environmental information for the Administratorto prepare an environmental impact statement (EIS) on the proposed miningactivities, and to determine the appropriate permit TCRs based on environmentalcharacteristics of the requested minesite. The Administrator may requirethe submission of additional data, in the event he determines that thebasis for a suitable EIS, or a determination of appropriate TCRs, is notavailable.(b)(1) In preparing the EIS, the Administrator will attempt to characterizethe environment in such a way as to provide a basis for judging the potentialfor significant adverse effects or irreparable harm triggered by commercialmining (see Subpart F). In compiling these data, the Administrator willutilize existing information including the relevant license EIS, additionalexploration data acquired by the applicant, and other data in the publicdomain.(2) The EIS must present adequate physical, chemical, and biological informationfor the permit area. If the permit area lies within the area of NOAA'sDeep Ocean Mining Environmental Study (DOMES), the parameters listed inNOAA's Technical Guidance Document pertaining to the upper and lower watercolumn should be included. Specifically, these parameters include:(i) Upper water column_<ITAG tagnum="15">Nutrients</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Endangered species</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Salinity, temperature, density</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Currents.</ITAG>(ii) Lower water column and seafloor_<ITAG tagnum="15">Currents</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Suspended particulate matter dispersion</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Sediment characteristics (mineralogy, particle size, shape and density,and water content)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Topography</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="15">Benthos.</ITAG>(3) For a permit area outside the DOMES area, the applicant is encouragedto consult with NOAA at the earliest opportunity in order to determinethe specific parameters to be measured based on the location and specificenvironmental characteristics of the permit area. The Administrator, inconsultation with the Administrator of the Environmental Protection Agencyand with the assistance of other appropriate Federal agencies, may determinethat a programmatic EIS is required for any new area.(c) The application must include a monitoring plan for test mining andat-sea commercial recovery activities which meets the objectives and requirementsof andSection; 971.603.(d) <T3>Use conflict analysis. </T3>The application must include informationknown to the applicant on other uses of the proposed mining area to supportthe Administrator's determination regarding potential use conflicts betweencommercial mining activities and those activities of other nations or ofother U.S. citizens.(e) <T3>Onshore information. </T3>Because of NEPA requirements, the Administratormust include in the EIS on the proposed permit the complete spectrum ofactivities resulting from the issuance of a permit. Therefore, onshoreinformation including the location and operation of nodule processing facilitiesmust be submitted with the application in accordance with the details inandSection; 971.606.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.205</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Vessel safety and documentation.</ITAG>In order to provide a basis for the necessary determinations with respectto the safety of life and property at sea, pursuant to andSection; 971.407,andSection; 971.422 and Subpart G of this part, the application must containthe following information for vessels used in commercial recovery, exceptfor those vessels under 300 gross tons which are engaged in oceanographicresearch:(a) <T3>U.S. flag vessel. </T3>All mining ships and at least one of the transportships used by each permittee must be documented under the laws of the UnitedStates. To the extent that the applicant knows which United States flagvessels it will use, it must include with its application copies of thevessels' current valid Coast Guard Certificates of Inspection.(b) <T3>Foreign flag vessels. </T3>To the extent that the applicant knows whichforeign flag vessel(s) it will be using for other purposes, the applicationmust include evidence of the following:(1) That any foreign flag vessel whose flag state is party to the InternationalConvention for the Safety of Life at Sea, 1974 (SOLAS 74) possesses currentvalid SOLAS 74 certificates;(2) That any foreign flag vessel whose flag state is not party to SOLAS74 but is party to the International Convention for the Safety of Lifeat Sea, 1960 (SOLAS 60) possesses current valid SOLAS 60 certificates;and(3) That any foreign flag vessel whose flag state is not a party to eitherSOLAS 74 or SOLAS 60 meets all applicable structural and safety requirementscontained in the published rules of a member of the International Associationof Classification Societies (IACS).(c) <T3>Supplemental certificates. </T3>If the applicant does not know at thetime of submitting an application which vessels it will be using, it mustsubmit the applicable certification for each vessel before the cruise onwhich it will be used.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.206</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Statement of ownership.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>The application must include sufficient information todemonstrate that the applicant is a United States citizen.(b) <T3>Specific. </T3>In particular, the application must include:(1) Name, address, and telephone number of the United States citizen responsiblefor commercial recovery operations;(2) A description of the citizen or citizens engaging in commercial recovery,including:(i) Whether the citizen is a natural person, partnership, corporation,joint venture, or other form of association;(ii) The state of incorporation or state in which the partnership or otherbusiness entity is registered;(iii) The name and place of business of the registered agent or equivalentrepresentative to whom notices and orders are to be delivered;(iv) Copies of all essential and nonproprietary provisions in articlesof incorporation, charter or articles of association; and(v) The name of each member of the association, partnership, or joint venture,including information about the participation and/or ownership of stockof each partner or joint venturer.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.207</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Antitrust information.</ITAG>In order to support the antitrust review referenced in andSection; 971.211,the application must contain information sufficient, in the applicant'sview and based on preapplication consultations pursuant to andSection; 971.200(g),to identify the applicant and describe any significant existing marketshare it has with respect to the mining or marketing of the metals proposedto be recovered under the permit.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.208</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Fee.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>Section 104 of the Act provides that no application forthe issuance or transfer of a permit will be certified unless the applicantpays to NOAA an administrative fee which reflects the reasonable administrativecosts incurred in reviewing and processing the application.(b) <T3>Amount. </T3>A fee payment of $100,000, payable to the National Oceanicand Atmospheric Administration, Department of Commerce, must accompanyeach application. If the administrative costs of reviewing and processingthe application are significantly less than or in excess of $100,000, theAdministrator, after determining the amount of the under- or over-charge,as applicable, will refund the difference or require the applicant to paythe additional amount before issuance or transfer of the permit. In thecase of an application for transfer of a permit to, or for a significantchange to a permit held by, an entity which has previously been found qualifiedfor a permit, the Administrator may reduce the fee in advance by an appropriateamount which reflects costs avoided by reliance on previous findings madein relation to the proposed transferee.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.209</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Processing outside the United States.</ITAG>(a) Except as provided in this section and andSection; 971.408, the processingof hard minerals recovered pursuant to a permit shall be conducted withinthe U.S., provided that the President or his designee does not determinethat this restriction contravenes the overriding national interests ofthe United States.(b) If foreign processing is proposed, the applicant shall submit a justificationdemonstrating the basis for a finding pursuant to andSection; 971.408(a)(1).The justification shall include an analysis of each factor which the applicantconsiders essential to its conclusion that processing at a site withinthe U.S. is not economically viable.(c) If the Administrator determines that the justification provided bythe applicant is insufficient, or if the Administrator receives duringthe public comment or hearing period what the Administrator determinesto be a serious alternative U.S. processing site proposal, the Administratormay require the applicant to supply, within a specified reasonable time,additional information relevant to the andSection; 971.408(a)(1) finding.(d) The applicant must include in its application satisfactory assurancesthat such resources after processing, to the extent of the permittee'sownership therein, will be returned to the United States for domestic useif the Administrator determines pursuant to andSection; 971.408 that thenational interest necessitates such return. Assurances must include proposedarrangements with the host country.<ITAG tagnum="84">Procedures</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.210</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Determination whether application is complete for further processing.</ITAG>Upon receipt of an application, the Administrator will review it to determinewhether it includes information specifically identifiable with and fullyresponsive to each requirement in andSection; 971.201 through andSection; 971.209.The Administrator will notify the applicant whether the application iscomplete within 60 days after it is received. The notice will identify,if applicable, in what respects the application is not complete, and willspecify the information which the applicant must submit in order to makeit complete, why the additional information is necessary, and a reasonabledate by which the application must be completed. Application processingwill not begin until the Administrator determines that the applicationis complete.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.211</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Consultation and cooperation with Federal agencies.</ITAG>(a) Promptly after receipt of an application that the Administrator hasdetermined pursuant to andSection; 971.210 is complete, the Administratorwill distribute a copy of the application to every Federal agency or departmentwhich, pursuant to section 103(e) of the Act, has identified programs oractivities within its statutory responsibilities which would be affectedby the activities proposed in the application (e.g., the Departments ofState, Transportation, Justice, Interior, Defense, Treasury and Labor,as well as the Environmental Protection Agency, Federal Trade Commission,International Trade Administration and National Science Foundation). Basedon its legal responsibilities and authorities, each such agency or departmentmay, not later than 60 days after it receives a copy of the application,recommend certification of the application, issuance or transfer of thepermit, or denial of such certification, issuance or transfer. The adviceor recommendation by the Attorney General or Federal Trade Commission onantitrust review, pursuant to section 103(d) of the Act, must be submittedwithin 90 days after their receipt of a copy of the application.(b) NOAA will use this process of consultation and cooperation to facilitatenecessary Federal decisions on proposed commercial recovery activities,pursuant to the mandate of section 103(e) of the Act to reduce the numberof separate actions required to satisfy Federal agencies' statutory responsibilities.The Administrator will not issue or transfer the permit during the 90 dayperiod after receipt by the Attorney General and the Federal Trade Commissionexcept upon written confirmation of the Attorney General and the FederalTrade Commission that neither intends to submit further comments or recommendationswith respect to the application.(c) In any case in which a Federal agency or department recommends a denial,it must set forth in detail the manner in which the application does notcomply with any law or regulation within its area of responsibility andhow the application may be amended, or how TCRs might be added to the permit,to assure compliance with such law or regulation.(d) NOAA will cooperate with such agencies and with the applicant withthe goal of resolving any concerns raised and satisfying the statutoryresponsibilities of these agencies.(e) If the Administrator decides to issue or transfer a permit with respectto which denial of the issuance or transfer has been recommended by theAttorney General or the Federal Trade Commission, or to issue or transfera permit without imposing TCRs recommended by the Attorney General or theFederal Trade Commission, as appropriate, the Administrator will, beforeor at issuance or transfer of the permit, notify the Attorney General andthe Federal Trade Commission of the reasons for his decision.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.212 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Public notice, hearing and comment.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Notice and comments. </T3>The Administrator will publish in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>, for each complete application for issuance ortransfer of a commercial recovery permit, notice that the application hasbeen received. Subject to andSection; 971.802, interested persons will beallowed to examine the materials relevant to the application, and willhave at least 60 days after publication of notice to submit written commentsto the Administrator.(b) <T3>Hearings. </T3>After preparation of the draft environmental impactstatement (EIS) on an application, the Administrator will hold a publichearing on the application and the draft EIS in an appropriate locationand may employ additional methods he/she deems appropriate to inform interestedpersons about each application and to invite comments thereon. A hearingwill be conducted in any State in which a processing plant or any of itsancillary facilities (such as a marine terminal or a waste disposal facility)are proposed to be located.(c) If the Administrator determines there exist one or more specific andmaterial factual issues which require resolution by formal processes, atleast one formal hearing will be held in the District of Columbia metropolitanarea in accordance with the provisions of Subpart I of this part. The recorddeveloped in any such formal hearing will be part of the basis of the Administrator'sdecisions on an application.(d) Hearings held pursuant to this section and other procedures will beconsolidated, if practicable, with hearings held and procedures employedby other Federal and State agencies.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.213 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Amendment to an application.</ITAG>After an application has been submitted to the Administrator, but beforea determination is made on the issuance or transfer of a permit, the applicantmust submit an amendment to the application if there is a significant changein the circumstances represented in the original application which affectsthe requirements of this subpart. Applicants should consult with NOAA todetermine if changes in circumstances are sufficiently significant to requiresubmission of an amendment. The application, as amended, would then serveas the basis for determinations by the Administrator under this part. Foreach amendment judged by the Administrator to be significant, the Administratorwill provide a copy of that amendment to each other Federal agency anddepartment which received a copy of the original application, and alsowill provide for public notice, hearing and comment on the amendment pursuantto andSection; 971.212. After the issuance or transfer of a permit, any revisionof the permit will be made pursuant to andSection; 971.413. Any amendmentor modification which would cause coastal zone effects substantially differentthan those originally reviewed by the state agency would be subject toFederal consistency review as prescribed in 15 CFR Part 930.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.214 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Consolidated license and permit procedures. [Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart C_Certification of Applications</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.300 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General.</ITAG>(a) Certification is an intermediate step between receipt of an applicationfor issuance or transfer of a permit and actual issuance or transfer. Itis a determination which focuses on the eligibility of the applicant.(b) Before the Administrator may certify an application for issuance ortransfer of a permit, the Administrator must determine that issuance ofthe permit would not violate any of the restrictions in andSection; 971.103(b).The Administrator also must make written determinations with respect tothe requirements with respect to the requirements set forth in andSection;971.301.(c) To the maximum extent possible, the Administrator will endeavor tocomplete certification within 100 days after receipt of a complete application.If final certification or denial of certification has not occurred within100 days after receipt of the application, the Administrator will informthe applicant in writing of the pending unresolved issues, the effortsto resolve them, and an estimate of the time required to do so.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.301 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Required findings.</ITAG>Before the Administrator may certify an application for a commercial recoverypermit, the Administrator must:(a) Approve the size and location of the commercial recovery area selectedby the applicant, and this approval will occur unless the Administratordetermines that (1) the area is not a logical mining unit under andSection;971.501, or (2) commercial recovery activities in the proposed area wouldresult in a significant adverse environmental effect which cannot be avoidedby imposition of reasonable restrictions; and(b) Find that the applicant_(1) Has demonstrated that, upon issuance or transfer of the permit, theapplicant will be financially responsible to meet all obligations whichmay be required to engage in its proposed commercial recovery activities;(2) Has demonstrated that, upon permit issuance or transfer, it will possess,or have access to, the technological capability to engage in the proposedcommercial recovery;(3) Has satisfactorily fulfilled all past obligations under any licenseor permit previously issued or transferred to the applicant under the Act;(4) Has a commercial recovery plan which meets the requirements of andSection;971.203; and(5) Has paid the permit fee specified in andSection; 971.208.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.302 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Denial of certification.</ITAG>(a) The Administrator may deny certification of an application if the Administratorfinds that the requirements of this subpart, or the requirements for issuanceor transfer under andSection; 971.403 through andSection; 971.408, have notbeen met.(b) When the Administrator proposes to deny certification the Administratorwill send to the applicant, via certified mail, return receipt requested,and publish in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>, written notice of intention to deny certification.The notice will include:(1) The basis upon which the Administrator proposes to deny certification;and(2) If the basis for the proposed denial is a deficiency which the Administratorbelieves the applicant can correct:(i) The action believed necessary to correct the deficiency; and(ii) The time within which any correctable deficiency must be corrected(not to exceed 180 days except as specified by the Administrator for goodcause).(c) The Administrator will deny certification:(1) On the 30th day after the date the notice is received by the applicant,under paragraph (b) of the section, unless before the 30th day the applicantfiles with the Administrator a written request for an administrative reviewof the proposed denial; or(2) On the last day of the period established under paragraph (b)(2)(ii)in which the applicant must correct a deficiency, if that deficiency hasnot been corrected before that day and an administrative review requestedpursuant to paragraph (c)(1) is not pending or in progress.(d) If a timely request for administrative review of the proposed denialis made by the applicant under paragraph (c)(1) of this section, the Administratorwill promptly begin a formal hearing. If the proposed denial is the resultof a correctable deficiency, the administrative review will proceed concurrentlywith any attempts to correct the deficiency, unless the parties agree otherwiseor the administrative law judge orders differently.(e) If the Administrator denies certification, he will send to the applicantwritten notice of the denial, including the reasons therefor.(f) Any final determination by the Administrator granting or denying certificationis subject to judicial review as provided in Chapter 7 of Title 5, UnitedStates Code.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.303 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notice of certification.</ITAG>Upon making a final determination to certify an application for a commercialrecovery permit, the Administrator will promptly send written notice ofthe determination to the applicant.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart D_Issuance/Transfer: Terms, Conditions and Restrictions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.400 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Proposal. </T3>After certification of an application pursuant to SubpartC of this part, the Administrator will proceed with a proposal to issueor transfer a permit for the commercial recovery activities described inthe application.(b) <T3>Terms conditions and restrictions. </T3>(1) Within 180 days after certification(or such longer period as the Administrator may establish for good causeshown in writing), the Administrator will propose terms and conditionsfor, and restrictions on, the proposed commercial recovery which are consistentwith the provisions of the Act and this part as set forth in andSection;971.418 through andSection; 971.430. Proposed and final TCRs will be uniformin all permits, except to the extent that differing physical and environmentalconditions and/or mining methods require the establishment of special TCRsfor the conservation of natural resources, protection of the environment,or the safety of life and property at sea. The Administrator will proposeTCRs in writing to the applicant, and public notice thereof will be providedpursuant to andSection; 971.401. The proposed TCRs will be included withthe draft of the EIS on permit issuance.(2) If the Administrator does not propose TCRs within 180 days after certification,the Administrator will notify the applicant in writing of the reasons fordelay and of the approximate date on which the proposed TCRs will be completed.(c) <T3>Findings. </T3>Before issuing or transferring a commercial recoverypermit, the Administrator must make written findings in accordance withthe requirements of andSection; 971.403 through andSection; 971.408. Thesefindings will be made after considering all information submitted withrespect to the application and proposed issuance or transfer. The Administratorwill make a final determination of issuance or transfer of a permit, andwill publish a final EIS on that action, within 180 days (or such longerperiod of time as the Administrator may establish for good cause shownin writing) following the date on which proposed TCRs and the draft EISare published.<ITAG tagnum="84">Issuance/Transfer, Modification/Revision; Suspension/Revocation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.401 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Proposal to issue or transfer and proposed terms, conditions and restrictions.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Notice and comment. </T3>The Administrator will publish in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> notice of each proposal to issue or transfer,including notice of a draft EIS, and of proposed terms and conditions for,and restrictions on, a commercial recovery permit that will be includedwith the draft EIS [see andSection; 971.400(b)]. Subject to andSection; 971.802,interested persons will be permitted to examine the materials relevantto such proposals. Interested persons and affected States will have atleast 60 days after publication of such notice to submit written commentsto the Administrator.(b) <T3>Hearings.</T3> (1) The Administrator will hold the public hearing(s)required by andSection; 971.212(b) in an appropriate location and may employsuch additional methods as he deems appropriate to inform interested personsabout each proposal and to invite their comments thereon. A copy of thenotice and draft EIS will be provided to the affected State agency. Informationprovided by NOAA may be used to supplement information provided by theapplicant, however it will not affect schedules for State agency reviewand decisions with respect to consistency determinations as required in15 CFR Part 930, Subpart D. (2) If the Administrator determines there exist one or more specific andmaterial factual issues which require resolution by formal processes, atleast one formal hearing, which may be consolidated with a hearing heldby another agency, will be held in the District of Columbia metropolitanarea in accordance with the provisions of Subpart I of this part. The recorddeveloped in any such formal hearing will be part of the basis for theAdministrator's decisions on issuance or transfer of, and on TCRs for,the permit.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.402 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Consultation and cooperation with Federal and State agencies.</ITAG>Before issuance or transfer of a commercial recovery permit, the Administratorwill conclude any consultations in cooperation with other Federal and Stateagencies which were initiated pursuant to andSection;andSection; 971.211 and971.200(g). These consultations will be held to assure compliance with,as applicable and among other statutes, the Endangered Species Act of 1973,as amended, the Marine Mammal Protection Act of 1972, as amended, the Fishand Wildlife Coordination Act, and the Coastal Zone Management Act of 1972,as amended. The Administrator also will consult, before any issuance, transfer,modification or renewal of a permit, with any affected Regional FisheryManagement Council established pursuant to section 302 of the MagnusonFishery Conservation and Management Act of 1976 (16 U.S.C. 1852) if theactivities undertaken pursuant to the permit could adversely affect anyfishery within the Fishery Conservation Zone (now known as the ExclusiveEconomic Zone), or any anadromous species or Continental Shelf fisheryresource subject to the exclusive management authority of the United Statesbeyond that zone.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.403 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Freedom of the high seas.</ITAG>(a) Before issuing or transferring a commercial recovery permit, the Administratormust find the recovery proposed in the application will not unreasonablyinterfere with the exercise of the freedoms of the high seas by other nations,as recognized under general principles of international law.(b) In making this finding, the Administrator will recognize that commercialrecovery of hard mineral resources of the deep seabed is a freedom of thehigh seas. In the exercise of this right, each permittee shall act withreasonable regard for the interests of other nations in their exerciseof the freedoms of the high seas.(c)(1) In the event of a conflict between the commercial recovery programof an applicant or permittee and a competing use of the high seas by anothernation or its nationals, the Administrator, in consultation and cooperationwith the Department of State and other interested agencies, will enterinto negotiations with that nation to resolve the conflict. To the maximumextent possible the Administrator will endeavor to resolve the conflictin a manner that will allow both uses to take place such that neither willunreasonably interfere with the other.(2) If both uses cannot be conducted harmoniously in the area subject tothe recovery plan, the Administrator will decide whether to issue or transferthe permit.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.404 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">International obligations of the United States.</ITAG>Before issuing or transferring a commercial recovery permit, the Administratormust find that the commercial recovery proposed in the application willnot conflict with any international obligation of the United States establishedby any treaty or international convention in force with respect to theUnited States.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.405 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Breach of international peace and security involving armed conflict.</ITAG>Before issuing or transferring a commercial recovery permit, the Administratormust find that the recovery proposed in the application will not createa situation which may reasonably be expected to lead to a breach of internationalpeace and security involving armed conflict.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.406 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Environmental effects.</ITAG>Before issuing or transferring a commercial recovery permit, the Administratormust find that the commercial recovery proposed in the application cannotreasonably be expected to result in a significant adverse environmentaleffect, taking into account the analyses and information in any applicableEIS and any TCRs associated with the permit. This finding also will bebased upon the requirements in Subpart F. However, as also noted in SubpartF, if a determination on this question cannot be made on the basis of availableinformation, and it is found that irreparable harm will not occur duringa period when an approved monitoring program is undertaken to further examinethe significant adverse environmental effect issue, a permit may be granted,subject to modification or suspension and, if necessary and appropriate,revocation pursuant to andSection; 971.417(a), or subject to emergency suspensionpursuant to andSection; 971.417(h).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.407 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Safety at sea.</ITAG>Before issuing or transferring a commercial recovery permit, the Administratormust find that the commercial recovery proposed in the application willnot pose an inordiante threat to the safety of life and property at sea.This finding will be based on the requirements in andSection; 971.205 andSubpart G.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.408 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Processing outside the United States.</ITAG>(a) Before issuing or transferring a commercial recovery permit which authorizesprocessing outside the U.S., the Administrator must find, after the opportunityfor an agency hearing required by andSection; 971.212(b), that:(1) The processing of the quantity concerned of hard mineral resource ata place other than within the United States is necessary for the economicviability of the commercial recovery activities of the permittee; and(2) Satisfactory assurances have been given by the permittee that suchresources, after processing, to the extent of the permittee's ownershiptherein, will be returned to the United States for domestic use, if theAdministrator so requires after determining that the national interestnecessitates such return.(b) At or after permit issuance the Administrator may determine, or revisea prior determination, that the national interest necessitates return tothe U.S. of a specified amount of hard mineral resource recovered pursuantto the permit and authorized to be processed outside the United States.Considerations in making this determination may include:(1) The national interest in an adequate supply of minerals;(2) The foreign policy interests of the United States; and(3) The multi-national character of deep seabed mining operations.(c) As appropriate, TCRs will incorporate provisions to implement the decisionof the Administrator made pursuant to this section.(d) Environmental considerations of the proposed activity will be addressedin accordance with andSection; 971.606(c).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.409 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Denial of issuance or transfer.</ITAG>(a) The Administrator may deny issuance or transfer of a permit if he findsthat the applicant or the proposed commercial recovery activities do notmeet the rquirements of this part for the issuance or transfer of a permit.(b) When the Administrator proposes to deny issuance or transfer, he willsend to the applicant, via certified mail, return receipt requested, andpublish in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>, written notice of his intention to deny issuanceor transfer. The notice will include:(1) The basis upon which the Administrator proposes to deny issuance ortransfer; and(2) If the basis for the proposed denial is a deficiency which the Administratorbelieves the applicant can correct:(i) The action believed necessary to correct the deficiency; and(ii) The time within which any correctable deficiency must be corrected(not to exceed 180 days except as specified by the Administrator for goodcause).(c) The Administrator will deny issuance or transfer:(1) On the 30th day after the date the notice is received by the applicantunder paragraph (b) of this section, unless before the 30th day the applicantfiles with the Administrator a written request for an administrative reviewof the proposed denial; or(2) On the last day of the period established under paragraph (b)(2)(ii)in which the applicant must correct a deficiency, if the deficiency hasnot been corrected before that day and an administrative review requestedpursuant to paragraph (c)(1) is not pending or in progress.(d) If a timely request for administrative review of the proposed denialis made by the applicant under paragraph (c)(1) of this section, the Administratorwill promptly begin a formal hearing in accordance with Subpart I. If theproposed denial is the result of a correctable deficiency, the administrativereview will proceed concurrently with any attempt to correct the deficiency,unless the parties agree otherwise or the administrative law judge ordersdifferently.(e) If the Administrator denies issuance or transfer, the Administratorwill send to the applicant written notice of final denial, including thereasons therefor.(f) Any final determination by the Administrator granting or denying issuanceor transfer of a permit is subject to judicial review as provided in Chapter7 of Title 5, United States Code.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.410</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Notice of issuance or transfer.</ITAG>If the Administrator finds that the requirements of this subpart have beenmet, he will issue or transfer the permit along with the appropriate TCRs.Notice of issuance or transfer will be made in writing to the applicantand published in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.411 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Objections to terms, conditions and restrictions.</ITAG>(a) The permittee may file a notice of objection to any TCR in the permit.The permittee may object on the grounds that any TCR is inconsistent withthe Act or this part, or on any other grounds which may be raised underapplicable provisions of law. If the permittee does not file notice ofan objection within the 60-day period immediately following the permittee'sreciept of the notice of issuance or transfer under andSection; 971.410,the permittee will be deemed conclusively to have accepted the TCRs inthe permit.(b) Any notice of objection filed under paragraph (a) of this section mustbe in writing, must indicate the legal or factual basis for the objection,and must provide information relevant to any underlying factual issuesdeemed by the permittee as necessary to the Administrator's decision uponthe objection.(c) Within 90 days after receipt of the notice of objection, the Administratorwill act on the objection and publish in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>, as well as provide to the permittee, writtennotice of the decision.(d) If, after the Administrator takes final action on an objection, thepermittee demonstrates that a dispute remains on a material issue of fact,the Administrator will provide for a formal hearing which will proceedin accordance with Subpart I of this part.(e) Any final determination by the Administrator on an objection to TCRsin a permit, after the formal hearing provided in paragraph (d), is subjectto judicial review as provided in Chapter 7 of Title 5, United States Code.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.412 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Changes in permits and permit terms, conditions, and restrictions.</ITAG>(a) During the duration of a commercial recovery permit, changes in thepermit or its associated commercial recovery plan may be initiated by eitherthe permittee or the Administrator.(b) A significant change is one which, if approved, would result in:(1) An increase of more than five percent in the size of the commercialrecovery area; or(2) A change in the location of five percent or more of the commercialrecovery area.(c) A major change is one affecting one or more of:(1) The bases for certifying the original application pursuant to andSection;971.301;(2) The bases for issuing or transferring the permit pursuant to andSection;971.403 through andSection; 971.408;(3) The TCRs issued as part of the permit pursuant to andSection; 971.418through andSection; 971.430; or(4) The ownership of a permittee (or the membership of the joint venture,partnership or other entity on whose behalf the permit was issued); andwhich change is sufficiently broad in scope to raise a question as to:(i) The permittee's ability to meet the requirements of the sections citedin paragraphs (c)(1) and (2) of this section;(ii) The sufficiency of the TCRs to accomplish their intended purpose;or (iii) The antitrust characteristic of the permittee.(d) A minor change is one that is clearly more modest in scope than thechanges described in paragraph (b) or (c) of this section.(e) A permittee may not implement a significant or major change, as definedin paragraphs (b) and (c) of this section, until an application for revisionof the permit or its associated commercial recovery plan has been approvedby the Administrator. However, advance notice of proposed major changesin a permittee's corporate membership or legal structure is not required,unless practicable, but the Administrator expects prompt notification ofthe occurrence of such a major change.(f) A proposed significant or major change, as defined in paragraphs (b)and (c) of this section, may trigger the need for additional review, underthe Federal consistency provisions of the Coastal Zone Management Act of1972, as amended.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.413 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Revision of a permit.</ITAG>(a) During the term of a commercial recovery permit, the permittee maysubmit to the Administrator an application for a revision of the permitor the commercial recovery plan associated with it to accommodate changesdesired by the permittee. In some cases it may be advisable to recognizeat the time of filing the original permit application that, although theessential information for issuing or transferring a permit as specifiedin andSection; 971.201 through andSection; 971.209 must be included in suchapplication, some details may have to be provided in the future in theform of a revision. In such instances, the Administrator may issue or transfera permit which would authorize commercial recovery activities and plansonly to the extent described in the application.(b) An application by a permittee for a revision of a permit or its associatedcommercial recovery plan involving a significant change, as defined inandSection; 971.412(b), must be followed by the full application proceduresin this part, including a public hearing.(c) An application by a permittee for a revision of a permit or its associatedcommercial recovery plan involving a major change, as defined in andSection;971.412(c) (See also andSection; 971.425 of this part), will be acted onafter notice thereof is published by the Administrator in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> with a 60-day opportunity for public commentand consultation with appropriate Federal agencies.(d)(1) The Administrator will approve a revision if the Administrator findsin writing that the revision will comply with the requirements of the Actand this part.(2) Notice of the Administrator's decision on the proposed revision willbe provided to the permittee in writing and published in the <T4>Federal Register.</T4>(e) A permittee may notify the Administrator of minor changes, as definedin andSection; 971.412(d), subsequently in the annual report (See andSection;971.801 of this part).(f) If the relative importance of the change is unclear to the permittee,the Administrator should be notified in advance so that the Administratorcan decide whether a revision in accordance with andSection; 971.412(e) isrequired.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.414 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Modification of permit terms, conditions, and restrictions.</ITAG>(a) After issuance or transfer of any permit, the Administrator, afterconsultation with appropriate Federal agencies and the permittee, may modifythe TCRs in a permit for the following purposes:(1) To avoid unreasonable interference with the interests of other nationsin their exercise of the freedoms of the high seas, as recognized undergeneral principles of international law. This determination will take intoaccount the considerations listed in andSection; 971.403;(2) If relevant data and information (including, but not limited to, dataresulting from activities under a permit) indicate that modification isrequired to protect the quality of the environment or to promote the safetyof life and property at sea; (3) To avoid a conflict with any international obligation of the UnitedStates, established by any treaty or convention in force with respect tothe United States, as determined in writing by the President; or (4) To avoid any situation which may reasonably be expected to lead toa breach of international peace and security involving armed conflict,as determined in writing by the President.(b) A proposal by the Administrator to modify the TCRs in a permit is significantand must be followed by the full application procedures in this part, includinga public hearing, if it would result in either of the changes identifiedin andSection; 971.412(b).(c) All proposed modifications other than those described in paragraph(b) of this section will be acted on after the Administrator provides:(1) Written notice of the proposal to the permittee; and(2) Publication of this proposal in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> with a 60-day opportunity for comment.(d)(1) The Administrator will effect a modification of the TCRs if theAdministrator finds in writing that the proposed modification will complywith the requirements of the Act and this part.(2) Upon adopting a TCR modification, the Administrator shall issue tothe permittee an amended permit including the modified TCRs, and shallpublish notice of issuance in the <T4>Federal Register.</T4>(3) The procedures for objection to modification of the TCRs are the sameas those for objection to a TCR under andSection; 971.411 of this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.415 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Duration of a permit.</ITAG>(a) Unless suspended or revoked pursuant to andSection;andSection; 971.406and 971.417, each commercial recovery permit will be issued for a periodof 20 years and for so long thereafter as hard mineral resources are recoveredannually in commercial quantities from the area listed in the permit.(b) If the permittee has substantially complied with the permit and itsassociated recovery plan and requests an extension of the permit, the Administratorwill extend the permit with appropriate TCRs, consistent with the Act,for so long thereafter as hard mineral resources are recovered annuallyin commercial quantities from the area to which the recovery plan associatedwith the permit applies. The Administrator may make allowance for deviationfrom the recovery plan for good cause, such as significantly changed marketconditions. However, a request for extension must be accompanied by anamended recovery plan to govern the activities by the permittee duringthe extended period.(c) Successive extensions may be requested, and will be granted by theAdministrator, based on the criteria specified in paragraphs (a) and (b).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.416</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Approval of permit transfers. </ITAG>(a) The Administrator may transfer a permit after a written request bythe permittee. After a permittee submits a transfer request to the Administrator,the proposed transferee will be deemed an applicant for a commercial recoverypermit, and will be subject to the requirements and procedures of thispart. (b) The Administrator will transfer a permit if the proposed transfereeis a United States citizen and proposed commercial recovery activitiesmeet the requirements of the Act and this part, and if the proposed transferis in the public interest. The Administrator will presume that the transferis in the public interest if it meets the requirements of the Act and thispart. In case of mere change in the form or ownership of a permittee, theAdministrator may waive relevant determinations for requirements for whichno changes have occurred since the preceding application. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.417 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Suspension or modification of activities; suspension or revocationof permits. </ITAG>(a) The Administrator may: (1) In addition to, or in lieu of, the imposition of any civil penaltyunder Subpart J of this part, or in addition to the imposition of any fineunder Subpart J, suspend or revoke any permit issued under this part, orsuspend or modify any particular activities under such a permit, if thepermittee substantially fails to comply with any provision of the Act,this part, or any term, condition or restriction of the permit; and (2) Suspend or modify particular activities under any permit, if the Presidentdetermines that such suspension or modification is necessary: (i) To avoid any conflict with any international obligation of the UnitedStates established by any treaty or convention in force with respect tothe United States; or (ii) To avoid any situtation which may reasonably be expected to lead toa breach of international peace and security involving armed conflict.(b) Any action taken by the Administrator in accordance with paragraph(a)(1) will proceed pursuant to the procedures in andSection; 971.1003. Anyaction taken in accordance with paragraph (a)(2) will proceed pursuantto paragraphs (c) through (i) of this section, other than paragraph (h)(2).(c) Prior to taking any action specified in paragraph (a)(2) the Administratorwill publish in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>, and send to the permittee, written notice ofthe proposed action. The notice will include:(1) The basis of the proposed action; and (2) If the basis for the proposed action is a deficiency which the Administratorbelieves the permittee can correct:(i) The action necessary to correct the deficiency; and(ii) The time within which any correctable deficiency must be corrected(not to exceed 180 days except as specified by the Administrator for goodcause).(d) The Administrator will take the proposed action:(1) On the 30th day after the date notice is sent to the permittee, underparagraph (c) of this section, unless before the 30th day the permitteefiles with the Administrator a written request for an administrative reviewof the proposed action; or(2) On the last day of the period established under paragraph (c)(2)(ii)in which the permittee must correct the deficiency, if such deficiencyhas not been corrected before that day and an administrative review requestedpursuant to paragraph (d)(1) is not pending or in progress.(e) If a timely request for administrative review of the proposed denialis made by the permittee under paragraph (d)(1) of this section, the Administratorwill promptly begin a formal hearing in accordance with Subpart I of thispart. If the proposed denial is the result of a correctable deficiency,the administrative review will proceed concurrently with any attempt tocorrect the deficiency, unless the parties agree otherwise or the administrativelaw judge orders differently.(f) The Administrator will serve on the permittee, and publish in the <T4>Federal Register</T4>, written notice of the action taken includingthe reasons therefor.(g) Any final determination by the Administrator to take the proposed actionis subject to judicial review as provided in Chapter 7 of Title 5, UnitedStates Code.(h) The issuance of any notice of proposed action under this section willnot affect the continuation of commercial recovery activities by a permittee.The provisions of paragraphs (c), (d), (e) and the first sentence of thisparagraph (h) of this section will not apply when:(1) The President determines by Executive Order that an immediate suspensionor modification of particular activities under that permit, is necessaryfor the reasons set forth in paragraph (a)(2); or(2) The Administrator determines that immediate suspension of such a permitor immediate suspension or modification of particular activities undera permit, is necessary to prevent a significant adverse environmental effector to preserve the safety of life or property at sea, and the Administratorissues an emergency order in accordance with andSection;971.1003(d)(4).(i) The Administrator will immediately rescind the suspension order assoon as he has determined that the cause for suspension has been removed.<ITAG tagnum="84">Terms, Conditions and Restrictions</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;971.418</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Diligence requirements.</ITAG>The TCRs in each commercial recovery permit must include provisions toassure diligent development consistent with andSection;971.503, includinga requirement that recovery at commercial scale be underway within tenyears from the date of permit issuance unless that deadline is extendedby the Administrator for good cause.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;971.419</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Environmental protection requirements.</ITAG>(a) Each commercial recovery permit must contain TCRs established by theAdministrator pursuant to Subpart F which prescribe actions the permitteemust take in the conduct of commercial recovery activities to assure protectionof the environment. Factors to be taken into account regarding the potentialfor significant adverse environmental effects are discussed in andSection;andSection;971.601and 971.602.(b) Before establishing the TCRs pertaining to environmental protection,the Administrator will consult with the Administrator of the EnvironmentalProtection Agency, the Secretary of State and the Secretary of the departmentin which the Coast Guard is operating. The Administrator also will takeinto account and give due consideration to formal comments received fromthe public, including those from the State agency, and to the informationcontained in the final site-specific EIS prepared with respect to the proposedpermit.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;971.420</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Resource conservation requirements.</ITAG>For the purpose of conservation of natural resources, each permit issuedunder this part will contain, as needed, TCRs which have due regard forthe prevention of waste and the future opportunity for the commercial recoveryof the unrecovered balance of the hard mineral resources in the recoveryarea. The Administrator will establish these requirements pursuant to andSection;971.502.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.421</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Freedom of the high seas requirements.</ITAG>Each permit issued under this part must include appropriate restrictionsto ensure that commercial recovery activities do not unreasonably interferewith the interests of other nations in their exercise of the freedoms ofthe high seas, as recognized under general principles of internationallaw. The Administrator will consider the factors in andSection; 971.403 inestablishing these restrictions.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;971.422</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Safety at sea requirements.</ITAG>The Secretary of the department in which the Coast Guard is operating,in consultation with the Administrator, will require in any permit issuedunder this part, in conformity with principles of international law, thatvessels documented under the laws of the United States and used in activitiesauthorized under the permit comply with conditions regarding design, construction,alteration, repair, equipment, operation, manning and maintenance relatingto vessel and crew safety and the promotion of safety of life and propertyat sea. These requirements will be established with reference to SubpartG of this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.423</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Best available technology.</ITAG>The Administrator will require in all activities under new permits, andwherever practicable in activities under existing permits, the use of thebest available technologies for the protection of safety, health, and theenvironment wherever such activities would have a significant adverse effecton safety, health, or the environment, (see andSection;andSection; 971.203(b)(3),971.602(f), and 971.604(a)), except where the Administrator determinesthat the incremental benefits are clearly insufficient to justify the incrementalcosts of using such technologies.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.424</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Monitoring requirements.</ITAG>Each commercial recovery permit will require the permittee:(a) To allow the Administrator to place appropriate Federal officers oremployees as observers aboard vessels used by the permittee in commercialrecovery activities to:(1) Monitor activities at times, and to the extent, the Administrator deemsreasonable and necessary to assess the effectiveness of the TCRs of thepermit; and(2) Report to the Administrator whenever those officers or employees havereason to believe there is a failure to comply with the TCRs;(b) To cooperate with Federal officers and employees in the performanceof monitoring functions; and(c) To monitor the environmental effects of the commercial recovery activitiesin accordance with a monitoring plan approved and issued by NOAA as permitTCRs and to submit data and other information as necessary to permit evaluationof environmental effects. The environmental monitoring plan and reportingwill respond to the concerns and procedures discussed in Subpart F.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.425</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Changes of circumstances.</ITAG>Each permit must require the permittee to advise the Administrator of anychanges of circumstances which might constitute a revision which wouldbe a major change under andSection; 971.412(c). Changes in ownership, financing,and use conflicts are examples, as are technology or methodology changesincluding those which might result in significant adverse environmentaleffects. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.426</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Annual report and records maintenance.</ITAG>Each permit will require the permittee to submit an annual report and maintaininformation in accordance with andSection; 971.801 including compliance withthe commercial recovery plan and the quantities of hard mineral resourcesrecovered and the disposition of such resources.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.427</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Processing outside the United States.</ITAG>If appropriate TCRs will incorporate provisions to implement the decisionof the Administrator regarding the return of resources processed outsidethe United States, in accordance with andSection; 971.408.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.428</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Other necessary permits.</ITAG>Each permit will provide that securing the deep seabed mining permit foractivities described in the recovery plan and accompanying applicationdoes not eliminate the need to secure all other necessary Federal, State,and local permits.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.429</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Special terms, conditions and restrictions.</ITAG>Although the general criteria and standards to be used in establishingTCRs for a permit are set forth in this part, as referenced in andSection;971.418 through andSection; 971.428, the Administrator may impose specialTCRs for the conservation of natural resources, protection of the environment,or the safety of life and property at sea when required by differing physicaland environmental conditions.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.430</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Other Federal requirements. </ITAG>Pursuant to andSection; 971.211, another Federal agency, or a State actingunder Federal authority, upon review of a commercial recovery permit applicationsubmitted under this part, may propose that certain TCRs be added to thepermit, to assure compliance with any law or regulation within that agency'sarea of responsibility. The Administrator will include appropriate TCRsin a permit.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart E_Resource Development</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.500</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General.</ITAG>Several provisions in the Act relate to appropriate mining techniques ormining efficiency. These raise what could be characterized as resourcedevelopment issues. In particular, section 103(a)(2)(C) requires a resourceassessment to be provided with the recovery plan. Section 103(a)(2)(D)of the Act provides that the applicant will select the size and locationof the area of a recovery plan, which will be approved unless the Administratorfinds that the area is not a ``logical mining unit'' or the commercialrecovery activities in the proposed site would result in a significantadverse environmental effect which cannot be avoided by the impositionof reasonable restrictions. Also, pursuant to section 108 of the Act, theapplicant's recovery plan and the TCRs of each permit must be designedto ensure diligent development. In addition, for the purpose of conservationof natural resources, section 110 of the Act provides that each permitis to contain, as needed, terms, conditions, and restrictions which havedue regard for the prevention of waste and the future opportunity for thecommercial recovery of the unrecovered balance of the resources.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.501</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Resource assessment, recovery plan, and logical mining unit.</ITAG>(a) The applicant must submit with the application a resource assessmentto provide a basis for assessing the area applied for. This assessmentmust include a discussion of mineable and unmineable areas, taking intoaccount nodule grade, nodule concentration, and other factors such as seafloortopography. These areas may be delineated graphically. The resources inthe area must be described in relation to the applicant's production requirements,operating period, and recovery efficiency in order to justify the areaapplied for.(b) The applicant shall select the size and location of the area of therecovery plan, which area shall be approved unless the Administrator findsthat, among other considerations (see andSection;971.301(a)), the area isnot a logical mining unit. In the case of a commercial recovery permit,a logical mining unit is an area of the deep seabed:(1) In which hard mineral resources can be recovered in sufficient quantitiesto satisfy the permittee's estimated production requirements over the initial20-year term of the permit in an efficient, economical, and orderly mannerwith due regard for conservation and protection of the environment, takinginto consideration the resource data, other relevant physical and environmentalcharacteristics, and the state of the technology of the applicant set outin the recovery plan;(2) Which is not larger than necessary to satisfy the permittee's estimatedproduction requirements over the initial 20-year term of the permit; and(3) In relation to which the permittee's estimated production requirementsare not found by the Administrator to be unreasonable.(c) Approval by the Administrator of a proposed logical mining unit willbe based on a case-by-case review of each application. The area need notconsist of contiguous segments, as long as each segment would be efficientlymineable and the total proposed area constitutes a logical mining unit.(d) In describing the area, the applicant must present the geodetic coordinatesof the points defining the boundaries referred to the World Geodetic System(WGS) Datum. A boundary between points must be a geodesic. If grid coordinatesare desired, the Universal Transverse Mercator Grid System must be used.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;971.502</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Conservation of resources.</ITAG>(a) If the Administrator establishes terms, conditions and restrictionsrelating to conservation of resources, he will employ a balancing processin the consideration of the state of the technology being developed, theprocessing system utilized and the value and potential use of any waste,the environmental effects of the recovery activities, economic and resourcedata, and the national need for hard mineral resources.(b) The application must set forth how the applicant's proposed methodof collecting nodules will conserve resources by providing for the futureopportunity for commercial recovery of the unrecovered balance of the resourcesin the proposed permit area. Although preliminary and subject to change,the discussion must include a plan for the chronology of areas to be mined.This is needed in order for the Administrator to determine if selectivemining, expected to be carried out in the early years to improve cash flow,is part of a long range recovery plan.(c) If the applicant proposes a refining process that does not includethe use of manganese in a productive manner, it may not render the manganeseunavailable to future users by dispersing the tailings over a vast areaunless such a scheme is necessary for the financial practicability of thecommercial recovery activities of the applicant. A permittee must advisethe Administrator in the annual report of the location, composition andquantity of manganese in tailings which remain after processing. Shouldnational needs for manganese develop during the duration of a permit, e.g.,in case of national emergency, the Administrator may cancel the exceptiongranted involving dispersion of tailings. Applicants seeking an exceptionwould be required to demonstrate how and in what time frame their commercialrecovery processing activities could be modified to respond to new nationalneeds.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;971.503</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Diligent commercial recovery.</ITAG>(a) Each permittee must pursue diligently the activities described in itsapproved commercial recovery plan. This requirement applies to the fullscope of the plan, including environmental safeguards and monitoring systems.Permit TCRs will require periodic reasonable expenditures for commercialrecovery by the permittee, taking into account the size of the area ofthe deep seabed to which the recovery plan applies and the amount of fundsestimated by the Administrator to be required to initiate commercial recoveryof hard mineral resources within the time limit established by the Administrator.However, required expenditures will not be established at a level whichwould discourage commercial recovery or operational efficiency.(b) To meet the diligence requirement, the applicant must propose to theAdministrator an estimated schedule of activities and expenditures pursuantto andSection;971.203(b)(2). The schedule must show, and the Administratormust be able to make a reasonable determination, that the applicant canreasonably develop the resources in the permit area within the term ofthe permit. There must be a reasonable relationship between the size ofthe recovery area and the financial and technological resources reflectedin the application. The permittee must initiate the recovery of nodulesin commerical quantities within ten years of the issuance of the permitunless this deadline is extended by the Administrator for good cause.(c) Once commercial recovery is achieved, the permittee must, within reasonablelimits and taking into consideration all relevant factors, maintain commercialrecovery throughout the period of the permit. However, the Administratorwill, for good cause shown, authorize temporary suspension of commercialrecovery activities. The duration of any suspension will not exceed oneyear, unless the Administrator determines that conditions justify an extensionof the suspension.(d) Ultimately, the diligence requirement will involve a retrospectivedetermination by the Administrator, based on the permittee's reasonableconformance to the approved recovery plan. This determination, however,will take into account the need for some degree of flexibility in a recoveryplan. It also will include consideration of the needs and stage of developmentof the permittee based on the approved recovery plan; legitimate periodsof time when there is no or very low expenditure; and allowance for a certaindegree of flexibility for changes encountered by the permittee in marketconditions or other factors.(e) The permittee must submit a report annually reflecting its conformanceto the schedule of activities and expenditures contained in the permitand its associated recovery plan. In case of any changes requiring a revisionto an approved permit and recovery plan, the permittee must advise theAdministrator in accordance with andSection; 971.413.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart F_Environmental Effects</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.600</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General.</ITAG>The Act contains several provisions which relate to environmental protection.For example, section 105(a)(4) requires that, before the Administratormay issue a commercial recovery permit, he must find that the commercialrecovery proposed in the application cannot reasonably be expected to resultin a significant adverse environmental effect. In addition, each permitissued must contain TCRs which prescribe actions the permittee must takein the conduct of commercial recovery activities to assure protection ofthe environment (section 109(b)). The Act also provides for modificationby the Administrator of any TCR if relevant data and information indicatethat modification is required to protect the quality of the environment(section 105(c)(1)(B)). The Administrator also may order an immediate suspensionor modification of activities (section 106(c)), or require use of bestavailable technologies (section 109(b)), to prevent a significant adverseenvironmental effect. Furthermore, each permit issued under the Act mustrequire the permittee to monitor the environmental effects of commercialrecovery activities in accordance with guidelines issued by the Administrator,and to submit information the Administrator finds necessary and appropriateto assess environmental effects and to develop and evaluate possible methodsof mitigating adverse effects (section 114).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.601</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Environmental requirements.</ITAG>Before issuing a permit for the commercial recovery of deep seabed hardmineral resources, the Administrator must find that:(a) The issuance of a permit cannot reasonably be expected to result ina significant adverse environmental effect, or, if there is insufficientinformation to make that determination, that no irreparable harm will resultduring a period when monitoring of commerical recovery is undertaken togather sufficient information in order to determine the potential for oroccurrence of any significant adverse environmental effect. In examiningthis issue, NOAA will give consideration to the following Ocean DischargeCriteria of the Clean Water Act (40 CFR Part 125, Subpart M), as they maypertain to discharges and other environmental perturbations related tothe commercial recovery operations:(1) The quantities, composition and potential for bioaccumulation or persistenceof the pollutants to be discharged;(2) The potential transport of such pollutants by biological, physicalor chemical processes;(3) The composition and vulnerability of the biological communities whichmay be exposed to such pollutants including the presence of unique speciesor communities of species, the presence of species identified as endangeredor threatened pursuant to the Endangered Species Act, or the presence ofthose species critical to the structure or function of the ecosystem suchas those important for the food chain;(4) The importance of the receiving water area to the surrounding biologicalcommunity, including the presence of spawning sites, nursery/forage areas,migratory pathways, or areas necessary for other functions or criticalstages in the life cycle of an organism;(5) The existence of special aquatic sites including but not limited tomarine sanctuaries and refuges, parks, national and historic monuments,national seashores, wilderness areas and coral reefs;(6) The potential impacts on human health through direct and indirect pathways;(7) Existing or potential recreational and commercial fishing, includingfinfishing and shellfishing;(8) Any applicable requirements of an approved Coastal Zone Managementplan;(9) Such other factors relating to the effects of the discharge as maybe appropriate;(10) Marine water quality criteria developed pursuant to section 304(a)(1)of the Clean Water Act; and(b) The applicant has an approved monitoring plan (andSection; 971.603) andthe resources and other capabilities to implement it.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.602</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Significant adverse environmental effects.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Determination of significant adverse environmental effects. </T3>TheAdministrator will determine the potential for or the occurrence of anysignificant adverse environmental effect or impact (for the purposes ofsections 103(a)(2)(D), 105(a)(4), 106(c) and 109(b) (second sentence) ofthe Act), on a case-by-case basis.(b) <T3>Basis for determination. </T3>Determinations will be based upon thebest information available, including relevant environmental impact statements,NOAA-collected data, monitoring results, and other data provided by theapplicant or permittee, as well as consideration of the criteria in andSection;971.601(a).(c) <T3>Related considerations. </T3>In making a determination the Administratormay take into account any TCRs or other mitigation measures.(d) <T3>Activities with no significant adverse environmental effect. </T3>NOAAbelieves that exploration-type activities, as listed in the license regulations(15 CFR 970.701), require no further environmental assessment.(e) <T3>Activities with potential for significant adverse environmental effects.</T3>NOAA research has identified at-sea testing of recovery equipment,the recovery of manganese nodules in commercial quantities from the deepseabed, and the construction and operation of commercial-scale processingfacilities as activities which may have some potential for significantadverse envirnomental effects.(f) <T3>Related terms, conditions and restrictions. </T3>Permits will be issuedwith TCRs containing environmental requirements with respect to protection(pursuant to andSection; 971.419), mitigation (pursuant to andSection; 971.419),or best available technology requirements (pursuant to andSection; 971.423),as appropriate, and monitoring requirements (pursuant to andSection; 971.424)to acquire more information on the environmental effects of deep seabedmining.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.603</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">At-sea monitoring.</ITAG>(a) An applicant must submit with its application a monitoring plan designedto enable the Administrator to assess environmental impacts and to developand evaluate possible methods of mitigating adverse environmental effects,to validate assessments made in the EIS, and to assure compliance withthe environmental protection requirements of this part.(b) The monitoring plan shall include a characterization of the proposedmining system in terms of collector contact, benthic discharge and surfacedischarge.(c) The monitoring plan shall include determination of (1) the spatialand temporal characteristics of the mining ship discharges; (2) the spatialextent and severity of the benthic impact, including recovery rate andpattern of benthic recolonization; and (3) any secondary effects that resultfrom the impact of the mining collector and benthic plume.(d) The monitoring of benthic impact shall involve the study of two typesof areas, each selected by the permittee in consultation with NOAA, whichareas shall be representative of the environmental characteristics of thepermittee's site:(1) An impact reference area, located in a portion of a permit area tentativelyscheduled to be mined early in a commercial recovery plan; and (2) An interim preservational reference area, located in a portion of apermit area tentatively determined: to be non-mineable, not to be scheduledfor mining during the commercial recovery plan, or to be scheduled formining late in the plan.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">Reference areas may be selected provisionally prior to applicationfor a commercial recovery permit.(e) The following specific environmental parameters must be proposed forexamination in the applicant's monitoring plan:<ITAG tagnum="15">(1) Discharges_</ITAG>(i) Salinity, temperature, density.(ii) Suspended particulates concentration and density.(iii) Particulate and dissolved nutrients and metals.(iv) Size, configuration, and velocities of discharge.(2) Upper water column_(i) Nutrients.(ii) Endangered species (observations).(iii) Salinity, temperature, density.(iv) Currents and direct current shear.(v) Vertical distribution of light.(vi) Suspended particulate material advection and diffusion.(vii) In-situ settling velocities of suspended particulates.(viii) Zooplankton and trace metals uptake.(ix) Fish larvae.(x) Behavior of biota, including commercially and recreationally valuablefish.(3) Lower water column and seafloor_(i) Currents.(ii) Suspended particulate material advection and diffusion.(iii) In-situ settling velocities of suspended particulates.(iv) Benthic scraping and blanketing, and their impacts and recovery.(f) The monitoring plan shall include provision for monitoring those areasimpacted by the permittee's mining activities, even if such areas falloutside its minesite, where the proposed activities have the potentialto cause significant adverse environmental effect or irreparable harm inthe outside area.(g) After the Administrator's approval of the monitoring plan, this planwill become a permit TCR. The monitoring plan TCR will include, to themaximum extent practicable, identification of those activities or eventsthat could cause suspension or modification due to environmental effectsunder andSection; 971.417, or permit revocation in the event that these effectscannot be adequately mitigated. The TCR also will authorize refinementof the monitoring plan prior to testing and commercial-scale recovery,and at other appropriate times, if refinement is necessary to reflect accuratelyproposed operations or to incorporate recent research or monitoring results.(h) If test mining is proposed, the applicant shall include in the monitoringplan a monitoring plan for the test(s) as well as a strategy for usingthe result to monitor more effectively commercial-scale recovery. Thismonitoring shall address concerns expressed in the PEIS and in the permitEIS.(i) The monitoring plan shall include a sampling strategy that assures:that it is based on sound statistical methods, that equipment and methodsbe scientifically accepted, that the personnel who are planning, collectingand analyzing data be scientifically well qualified, and that the resultantdata be submitted to the Administrator in accordance with formats of theNational Oceanographic Data Center and other formats as may be specifiedby the Administrator.(j) Pursuant to section 114(1) of the Act, the Administrator intends toplace observers onboard mining vessels, not only to ensure that permitTCRs are followed, but also to evaluate the effectiveness of monitoringstrategies, both in terms of protecting the environment and in being cost-effective(See andSection; 971.1005), and if necessary, to develop potential mitigationmeasures. If modification of permit TCRs or regulations is required toprotect the quality of the environment, the Administrator may modify TCRspursuant to andSection; 971.414, or the regulations pursuant to andSection;971.804.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.604</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Best available technologies (BAT) and mitigation.</ITAG>(a) The Administrator shall require in all activities under new permits,and wherever practicable in activities under existing permits, the useof the best available technologies for the protection of safety, health,and the environment wherever such activities would have a significant adverseeffect on safety, health, or the environment, except where the Administratordetermines that the incremental benefits are clearly insufficient to justifythe incremental costs of using such technologies. Because of the embryonicnature of the industry, NOAA is unable either to specify particular equipmentor procedures comprising BAT or to define performance standards. Untilsuch experience exists, the applicant shall submit such information asis necessary to indicate, as required above, the use of BAT, the alternativesconsidered to the specific equipment or procedures proposed, and the rationaleas to why one alternative technology was selected in place of another.This analysis shall include a discussion of the relative costs and benefitsof the technologies considered.(b) NOAA is not specifying particular mitigation methodologies or techniquesat this time (such as requiring the sub-surface release of mining vesseldischarges), but expects applicants and permittees to develop and carryout their operations, to the extent possible, to minimize adverse environmentaleffects and to be able to demonstrate efforts to that end. The applicantmust submit a plan describing how he would mitigate a problem, if it werecaused by the surface release of mining vessel discharges, including aplan for the monitoring of any discharges. Based upon monitoring results,NOAA may find it necessary in the future to specify particular proceduresfor minimizing adverse environmental effects. These procedures would beincorporated into permit TCRs.(c) NOAA will require the permittee to report, prior to implementation,any proposed technological or operational changes that will increase orhave unknown environmental effects. Changes in composition, concentrationor size distribution of suspended particulates discharged from the miningvessel, water depth of vessel discharges, depth of cut in the seafloorof the mining collector, and direction or amount of sediment dischargedat the seafloor are factors of concern to NOAA. In reporting any such change,the permittee shall submit information to indicate the use of BAT, alternativesconsidered, and rationale for selecting one technology in place of another,in a manner comparable to and to the extent required in paragraph (a) ofthis section. If proposed changes have a high potential for increasingadverse environmental effects, the Administrator may disapprove or requiremodification of the changes. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.605 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Stable Reference Areas. [Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.606 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Onshore information.  </ITAG>(a) To assist the Administrator in complying with NEPA requirements andto enable NOAA to function as lead agency in preparing permit site-specificenvironmental impact statements (EISs) and facilitating the preparationand processing of other environmental documents and permits, the applicationsmust include the following information: (1) The location and affected environment of port, transport, processingand waste disposal facilities and associated facilities (e.g., maps, landuse and layout);(2) A description of the environmental consequences and socio-economiceffects of construction and operation of the facilities, including wastecharacteristics and toxicity; (3) Any mitigating measures that may be proposed; (4) Certification of consistency with the federally approved State coastalmanagement program, where applicable, and evidence of the status of compliancewith other State or local requirements relating to protection of the environment;and (5) Alternative sites and technologies considered by the applicant andthe considerations which eliminate their selection. (b) The applicant must consult with NOAA as early as possible concerningthe information to be submitted to NOAA to prepare an adequate environmentalimpact statement. The applicant is encouraged to consult with potentiallyaffected States as early as is practicable [see also andSection; andSection;971.200(g) and 971.213].(c) The requirements of paragraphs (a)(1)-(3) and (5) of this section alsoapply if approval of processing outside the United States is requestedby the applicant, in accordance with Executive Order 12114 which requiresthe environmental review of major Federal actions abroad. Information detailingthe socio-economic impacts of foreign processing activities is not required.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart G-Safety of Life and Property at Sea</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.700 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General.</ITAG>The Act contains several requirements that relate to assuring the safetyof life and property at sea. For example, before the Administrator mayissue a permit, he must find that the proposed recovery will not pose aninordinate threat to the safety of life and property at sea (section 105(a)(5)).The Coast Guard, in consultation with NOAA, must require in any permitissued under the Act, in conformity with principles of international law,that vessels documented in the United States and used in activities authorizedunder the permit comply with conditions regarding the design, construction,alteration, repair, equipment, operation, manning and maintenance relatingto vessel and crew safety and the safety of life and property at sea (section112(a)). The Administrator may impose or modify TCRs for a permit if requiredto promote the safety of life and property at sea (section 105(c)(1)(B)).<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.701 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Criteria for safety of life and property at sea. </ITAG>Response to the safety at sea requirements in essence will involve vesselinspection requirements, as identified by present laws and regulations.The primary inspection statutes pertaining to United States flag vesselsare: 46 App. U.S.C. 86 (Loadlines) and 46 U.S.C. 3301 (Inspection of SeagoingBarges, Seagoing Motor Vessels, and Freight Vessels). United States flagvessels will be required to meet all applicable regulatory requirements,including the requirement for a current valid Coast Guard Certificate ofInspection (pursuant to andSection; 971.205(a)). United States flag vesselsare under United States jurisdiction on the high seas and subject to domesticenforcement procedures. With respect to foreign flag vessels, the SOLAS74 or SOLAS 60 certificate requirements specified in andSection; 971.205(b)apply. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart H_Miscellaneous </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.800 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General. </ITAG>The subpart contains miscellaneous provisions pursuant to the Act whichare applicable to exploration licenses and commercial recovery permits.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.801 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Records to be maintained and information to be submitted by licenseesand permittees. </ITAG>(a)(1) In addition to the information specified elsewhere in the part andin 15 CFR Part 970, each licensee and permittee must keep such records,consistent with standard accounting principles, as specified by the Administratorin the license or permit. Such records shall include information whichwill fully disclose expenditures for exploration for, or commercial recoveryof hard mineral resources in the area under license or permit, and anyother information which will facilitate an effective audit of these expenditures.(2) The Administrator and the Comptroller General of the United States,or any of their duly authorized representatives, shall have access, forpurposes of audit and examination to any books, documents, papers, andrecords of licensees and permittees which are necessary and directly pertinentto verification of the expenditures referred to in paragraph (a)(1) ofthis section. (b) In addition to the information specified elsewhere in this part andin 15 CFR Part 970, each applicant, licensee or permittee will be requiredto submit to the Administrator, upon request, data or other informationthe Administrator may reasonably need for purposes of: (1) Making determinations with respect to the issuance, revocation, modification,or suspension of the license or permit in question; (2) Evaluating the effectiveness of license or permit TCRs; (3) Compliance with the biennial Congressional report requirement containedin Section 309 of the Act; and (4) Evaluation of the exploration or commercial recovery activities conductedby the licensee or permittee.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">At a minimum, licensees and permittees shall submit an annual writtenreport within 90 days after each anniversary of the license or permit issuanceor transfer, discussing exploration or commercial recovery activities andexpenditures. The report shall address diligence requirements (see andSection;971.503 and 15 CFR 970.602), implementation of any approved monitoringplan (see andSection; 971.602 and 15 CFR 970.522(c) and 970.702(a)), andapplicable changes which do not constitute revisions (see andSection; 971.413(e)and 15 CFR 970.513(c)). Permittees must also report the tonnage of nodulesrecovered (andSection; 971.426) and discuss manganese conservation measures(see andSection; 971.502). <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.802 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Public disclosure of documents received by NOAA. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Purpose. </T3>This section provides a procedure by which persons submittinginformation pursuant to this part and 15 CFR Part 970 may request thatcertain information not be subject to public disclosure. The substantiationrequested is intended to assure that NOAA has a complete and proper basisfor determining the legality and appropriateness of withholding or releasingthe identified information if a public request for disclosure is received.(b) <T3>Written requests for confidential treatment. </T3>(1) Any person whosubmits any information pursuant to this part or 15 CFR Part 970, whichinformation is considered by that person to be protected by the Trade SecretsAct (18 U.S.C. 1905) or otherwise to be a trade secret or commercial orfinancial information which is privileged or confidential, may requestthat the Administrator give the information confidential treatment. (2)(i) Any request for confidential treatment of information: (A) Should be submitted at the time of submission of information; (B) Should state the period of time for which confidential treatment isdesired (e.g., until a certain date, or until the occurrence of a certainevent, or permanently); (C) Must be submitted in writing; and (D) Must include the name, mailing address, and telephone number of anagent of the submitter who is authorized to receive notice of requestsfor disclosure of the information pursuant to paragraph (d) of this section.(ii) If information is submitted to the Administrator without an accompanyingrequest for confidential treatment, the notice referred to in paragraph(d)(2) of this section need not be given. If a request for confidentialtreatment is received after the information itself is received, the Administratorwill make efforts to the extent administratively practicable to associatethe request with copies of the previously submitted information in thefiles of NOAA and the Federal agencies to which the Administrator distributedthe information. (3)(i) Information subject to a request for confidential treatment mustbe segregated from information for which confidential treatment is notbeing requested, and each page (or segregable portion of each page) subjectto the request must be clearly marked with the name of the person requestingconfidential treatment, the name of the applicant, licensee or permittee,and an identifying legend such as ``Proprietary Information'' or ``ConfidentialTreatment Requested.'' Where this marking proves impracticable, a coversheet containing the identifying names and legend must be securely attachedto the compilation of information for which confidential treatment is requested.Each copy of the information for which confidential treatment has beenrequested must be cross-referenced to the appropriate section of the applicationor other document. All information for which confidential treatment isrequested pertaining to the same application or other document must besubmitted to the Administrator in a package separate from that informationfor which confidential treatment is not being requested. (ii) Each copy of any application or other document with respect to whichconfidential treatment of information has been requested must indicate,at each place in the application or document where confidential informationhas been deleted, that confidential treatment of information has been requested.(4) Normally, the Administrator will not make a determination as to whetherconfidential treatment is warranted until a request for disclosure of theinformation is received. However, on a case-by-case basis, the Administratormay make a determination in advance of a request, where it would facilitateobtaining voluntarily submitted information (rather than information requiredto be submitted under this part). (c) <T3>Substantiation of request for confidential treatment. </T3>(1) Anyrequest for confidential treatment may include a statement of the basisfor believing that the information is deserving of confidential treatment,which addresses the issues relevant to a determination of whether the informationis a trade secret, or commercial or financial information which is privilegedor confidential. To the extent permitted by applicable law, part or allof any substantiation statement submitted will be treated as confidentialif so requested, and must be segregated, marked, and submitted in accordancewith the procedure described in paragraph (b)(3) of this section. (2) Issues addressed in the statement should include: (i) The commercial or financial nature of the information;(ii) The nature and extent of the competitive advantage enjoyed as a resultof possession of the information; (iii) The nature and extent of the competitive harm which would resultfrom public disclosure of the information; (iv) The extent to which the information has been disseminated to employeesand contractors of the person submitting the information; (v) The extent to which persons other than the person submitting the informationpossesses, or have access to, the same information; and (vi) The nature of the measures which have been and are being taken toprotect the information from disclosure. (d) <T3>Requests for disclosure of trade secrets, privileged, or confidentialinformation. </T3>(1) Any request for disclosure of information submitted,reported or collected pursuant to this part must be made in accordancewith 15 CFR 903.7. (2) Upon receipt of a request for disclosure of information for which confidentialtreatment has been requested, the Administrator immediately will issuenotice by an expeditious means (such as by telephone, confirmed by certifiedor registered mail, return receipt requested) of the request for disclosureto the person who requested confidential treatment of the information orto the designated agent. The notice also will: (i) Inquire whether that person continues to maintain the request for confidentialtreatment; (ii) Notify that person of the date (generally, not later than the closeof business on the seventh working day after issuance of the notice) bywhich the person is strongly encouraged to deliver to the Administratora written statement that the person either: (A) Waives or withdraws the request for confidential treatment in fullor in part; or(B) Confirms that the request for confidential treatment is maintained;(iii) Inform that person that by a date the Administrator specifies (generally,not later than the close of business on the seventh working day after issuanceof the notice), the person: (A) Is strongly encouraged to deliver to the Administrator a written statementaddressing the issues listed in paragraph (c)(2) of this section, describingthe basis for believing that the information is deserving of confidentialtreatment, if this statement was not previously submitted; (B) Is strongly encouraged to deliver to the Administrator an update ofor supplement to any statement previously submitted under paragraph (c)of this section; and (C) May present to the Administrator in a form the Administrator deemsappropriate (such as by telephone or in an informal conference) agrumentsagainst disclosure of the information; and (iv) Inform that person that the burden is on him to assure that any responseto the notice is delivered to the Administrator within the time specifiedin the notice. (3) To the extent permitted by applicable law, part or all or of any statementsubmitted in response to any notice issued under paragraph (d)(2) willbe treated as confidential if so requested by the person submitting theresponse. Any response for which confidential treatment is requested mustbe segregated, marked and submitted in accordance with the procedures describedin paragraph (b)(3) of this section. (4) Upon the expiration of the time allowed for response under paragraph(d)(2) of this section, the Administrator will determine, in consultationwith the General Counsel for the Department of Commerce, whether confidentialtreatment is warranted based on the information then available to NOAA.(5) If the person who requested confidential treatment waives or withdrawsthat request, the Administrator will proceed with appropriate disclosureof the information. (6) If the Administrator determines that confidential treatment is warranted,he will so notify the person requesting confidential treatment, and willissue an initial denial of the request for disclosure of records in accordancewith 15 CFR 903.8. (7) If the Administrator determines that confidential treatment is notwarranted for part or all of the information, the Administrator immediatelywill issue notice by an expeditious means (such as by telephone, confirmedby certified or registered mail, return receipt requested) to the personwho requested confidential treatment. The notice will state: (i) The basis for the Administrator's determination; (ii) That the Administrator's determination constitutes final agency actionon the request for confidential treatment; (iii) That the final agency action is subject to judicial review underChapter 7 of Title 5, United States Code; and (iv) That on the seventh working day after issuance of the notice describedin this paragraph (d)(7), the Administrator will make the information availableto the person who requested disclosure unless the Administrator has firstbeen notified of the filing of an action in a Federal court to obtain judicialreview of the determination, and the court has issued an appropriate orderpreventing or limiting disclosure. (8) The Administrator will keep a record of the date any notice is issuedand the date any response is received, by the Administrator, under thisparagraph (d). (9) In all other respects, procedures for handling requests for recordscontaining information submitted to, reported to, or collected by the Administratorpursuant to this part will be in accordance with 15 CFR Part 903. For example,if ten working days have passed after the receipt of a request for disclosureand, despite the exercise of due diligence by the agency, the Administratorcannot make a determination as to whether confidential treatment is warranted,the Administrator will issue appropriate notice in accordance with 15 CFR903.8(b)(5). (e) <T3>Direct submission of confidential information. </T3>If any person hasreason to believe that it would be prejudiced by furnishing informationrequired from it to the applicant, licensee or permittee, that person mayfile the required information directly with the Administrator. Informationfor which the person requests confidential treatment must be segregated,marked, and submitted in accordance with the procedures described in paragraph(b)(3) of this section. (f) <T3>Protection of confidential information transmitted by the Administratorto other agencies. </T3>Each copy of information for which confidentialtreatment has been requested which is transmitted by the Administratorto other Federal agencies will be accompanied by a cover letter containing:(1) A request that the other Federal agency maintain the information inconfidence in accordance with applicable law (including the Trade SecretAct, 18 U.S.C. 1905) and any applicable protective agreement entered intoby the Administrator and the Federal agency receiving the information;(2) A request that the other Federal agency notify the Administrator immediatelyupon receipt of any request for disclosure of the information; and (3) A request that all copies of the information be returned to the Administratorfor secure storage or disposal promptly after the Federal agency determinesthat it no longer needs the information for its official use. (g) When satisfied that adequate protection against public disclosure exists,applicants should provide the State agency with confidential and proprietaryinformation which the State agency maintains is necessary to make a reasoneddecision on the consistency of the proposal. State agency requests forsuch information must be related to the necessity of having such informationto assess adequately the coastal zone effects of the proposal.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.803</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Relinquishment and surrender of licenses and permits.</ITAG>(a) Any licensee or permittee may at any time, without penalty:(1) Surrender to the Administrator a license or permit issued to the licenseeor permittee; or(2) Relinquish to the Administrator, in whole or in part, any right toconduct any exploration or commercial recovery activities authorized bythe license or permit.(b) Any licensee or permittee who surrenders, or relinquishes any rightunder, a license or permit will remain liable with respect to all violationsand penalties incurred, and damage to persons or property caused, by thelicensee or permittee as a result of activities engaged in by the licenseeor permittee under the license or permit.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;971.804</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Amendment to regulations for conservation, protection of the environment,and safety of life and property at sea.</ITAG>The Administrator may amend the regulations in this part and 15 CFR Part970 at any time as the Administrator determines to be necessary and appropriatein order to provide for the conservation of natural resources, protectionof the environment, or the safety of life and property at sea. The amendedregulations will apply to all exploration or commercial recovery activitiesconducted under any license or permit issued or maintained pursuant tothis part or 15 CFR Part 970, except that amended regulations which providefor conservation of natural resources will apply to activities conductedunder an existing license or permit during the present term of that licenseor permit only if the Administrator determines that the amended regulationsproviding for conservation of natural resources will not impose seriousor irreparable economic hardship on the licensee or permittee. Any amendmentto regulations under this section will be made pursuant to the proceduresin Subpart I of this part.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;971.805</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Computation of time.</ITAG>Except where otherwise specified, Saturdays, Sundays and Federal Governmentholidays will be included in computing the time period allowed for filingany document or paper under this part or 15 CFR Part 970, but when a timeperiod expires on any of these days, that time period will be extendedto include the next following Federal Government work day. Filing periodsexpire at the close of business on the day specified, for the office specified.<ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart 1_Uniform Procedures</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.900 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Applicability.</ITAG>The regulations of this subpart govern the following hearings conductedby NOAA under this part and under 15 CFR Part 970:(a) All adjudicatory hearings required by section 116(b) of the Act tobe held on the following actions upon a finding by the Administrator thatone or more specific and material issues of fact exist which require resolutionby formal process, including but not limited to:(1) All applications for issuance or transfer of licenses or permits;(2) All proposed TCRs on a license or permit; and(3) All proposals to modify significantly a license or permit;(b) Hearings conducted under section 105(b)(3) of the Act on objectionby a licensee or permittee to any term, condition or restriction in a licenseor permit, or to modification thereto, where the licensee or permitteedemonstrates, after final action by the Administrator on the objection,that a dispute remains as to a material issue of fact;(c) Hearings conducted in accordance with section 106(b) of the Act pursuantto a timely request by an applicant or a licensee or permittee for reviewof:(1) A proposed denial of issuance or transfer of a license or permit; or(2) A proposed suspension or modification of particular activities undera license or permit after a Presidential determination pursuant to section106(a)(2)(B) of the Act;(d) Hearings conducted in accordance with section 308(c) of the Act toamend regulations for the purpose of conservation of natural resources,protection of the environment, and safety of life and property at sea;(e) Hearings conducted in accordance with andSection; 971.302 or 15 CFR 970.407on a proposal to deny certification of an application; and(f) Hearings conducted in accordance with 15 CFR Part 970, Subpart C todetermine priority of right among preenactment explorers.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.901 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Formal hearing procedures.</ITAG>(a) <T3>General. </T3>(1) All hearings described in andSection; 971.900 are governedby Subpart C of 15 CFR Part 904, as modified by this section. The rulesin this subpart take precedence over 15 CFR Part 904, Subpart C, to theextent there is a conflict.(2) Hearings held under this section will be consolidated insofar as practicablewith hearings held by other agencies.(3) For the purposes of this subpart, ``involved applicant, licensee orpermittee'' means an applicant, licensee or permittee the status of whoseapplication, license, permit or activities conducted under the licenseor permit may be altered by the Administrator as a result of proceedingsunder this subpart.(b) <T3>Decision to hold a hearing. </T3>Whenever the Administrator finds thata formal hearing is required by the provisions of this part or 15 CFR Part970, he will provide for a formal hearing. Upon deciding to hold a formalhearing, the Administrator will refer the proceeding to the Departmentof Commerce Office of Administrative Law Judges for assignment to an AdministrativeLaw Judge to serve as presiding officer for the hearing.(c) <T3>Notice of formal hearing. </T3>(1) The Administrator will publish noticeof the formal hearing in the Federal Register at least 15 days before thebeginning of the hearing, and will send written notice by registered orcertified mail to any involved applicant, licensee or permittee and toall persons who submitted written comments upon the action in question,or who testified at any prior informal hearing on the action or who fileda request for the formal hearing under this part or 15 CFR Part 970.(2) Notice of a formal hearing will include, among other things:(i) Time and place of the hearing and the name of the presiding judge,as determined under paragraph (b) of this section;(ii) The name and address of the person(s) requesting the formal hearingor a statement that the formal hearing is being held by order of the Administrator;(iii) The issues in dispute which are to be resolved in the formal hearing;(iv) The due date for filing a written request to participate in the hearingin accordance with paragraphs (f)(2) and (f)(3) of this section; and(v) Reference to any prior informal hearing from which the issues to bedetermined arose.(d) <T3>Powers and duties of the administrative law judge. </T3>In additionto the powers enumerated in 15 CFR Part 904. Subpart C, judges will havethe power to:(1) Regulate the course of the hearing and the conduct of the parties,interested persons and others submitting evidence, including but not limitedto the power to require the submission of part or all of the evidence inwritten form if the judge determines a party will not be prejudiced thereby,and if otherwise in accordance with law;(2) Rule upon requests submitted in accordance with paragraph (f)(2) ofthis section to participate as a party, or requests submitted in accordancewith paragraph (f)(3) of this section to participate as an interested personin a proceeding, by allowing, denying, or limiting such participation;and(3) Require at or prior to any hearing, the submission and exchange ofevidence.(e) <T3>Argument. </T3>At the close of the formal hearing, each party willbe given the opportunity to submit written arguments on the issues beforethe judge.(f) <T3>Hearing Participation.</T3>(1) Parties to the formal hearing will include:(i) The NOAA General Counsel;(ii) Any involved applicant, licensee or permittee; and(iii) Any other person determined by the judge, in accordance with paragraph(f)(2) below, to be eligible to participate as a full party.(2) Any person desiring to participate as a party in a formal hearing mustsubmit a request to the judge to be admitted as a party. The request mustbe submitted within ten days after the date of mailing or publication ofnotice of a decision to hold a formal hearing, whichever occurs later.Such person will be allowed to participate if the judge finds that theinterests of justice and a fair determination of the issues would be servedby granting the request. The judge may entertain a request submitted afterthe expiration of the ten days, but such a request may only be grantedupon an express finding on the record that:(i) Special circumstances justify granting the request;(ii) The interests of justice and a fair determination of the issues wouldbe served by granting the request;(iii) The requestor has consented to be bound by all prior written agreementsand stipulations agreed to by the existing parties, and all prior ordersentered in the proceedings; and(iv) Granting the request will not cause undue delay or prejudice the rightsof the existing parties.(3)(i) Any interested person who desires to submit evidence in a formalhearing must submit a request within ten days after the dates of mailingor publication of notice of a decision to hold a formal hearing, whicheveroccurs later. The judge may waive the ten day rule for good cause, suchas if the interested person, making this request after the expiration ofthe ten days, the formal hearing, and the evidence he proposes to submitmay significantly affect the outcome of the proceedings.(ii) The judge may permit an interested person to submit evidence at anyformal hearing if the judge determines that such evidence is relevant tofacts in dispute concerning the issue(s) being adjudicated. The fact thatan interested person may submit evidence under this paragraph at a hearingdoes not entitle the interested person to participate in other ways inthe hearing unless allowed by the judge under paragraph (f)(3)(iii) below.(iii) The judge may allow an interested person to submit oral testimony,oral arguments or briefs, or to cross-examine witnesses or participatein other ways, if the judge determines: (A) That the interests of justice would be better served by allowing suchparticipation by the interested person; and (B) That there are compelling circumstances favoring such participationby the interested person. (g) <T3>Definition of issues. </T3>(1) Whenever a formal hearing is conductedpursuant to this section the Administrator may certify the issues for decisionto the judge, and if the issues are so certified, the formal hearing willbe limited to those issues. (2) Whenever a formal hearing is conducted pursuant to a request by anapplicant, licensee or permittee for review of a denial of certification,issuance or transfer of a license or permit in accordance with section106(a)(4) of the Act, or pursuant to an objection to any term, condition,or restriction in a permit in accordance with section 105(b)(3) or (c)(4)of the Act, no issues may be raised by any party or interested person thatwere not previously raised in the administrative proceedings on the actionpursuant to any such section, unless the judge determines that good causeis shown for the failure to raise them. Good cause includes the case wherethe party seeking to raise the new issues shows that it could not reasonablyhave ascertained the issues at a prior stage in the administrative process,or that it could not have reasonably anticipated the relevance or materialityof the information sought to be introduced. (h) <T3>Decisions.</T3> (1) <T3>Proposed findings of fact and conclusions of law. </T3>The judge willallow each party to file with the judge proposed findings of fact, andin appropriate cases conclusions of law, together with a supporting briefexpressing the reasons for such proposals. Such proposals and briefs mustbe filed within ten days after the hearing or within such additional timeas the judge may allow. Such proposals and briefs must refer to all portionsof the record and to all authorities relied upon in support of each proposal.Reply briefs must be submitted within ten days after receipt of the proposedfindings and conclusions to which they respond, unless the judge allowsadditional time. (2) <T3>Recommended decision. </T3>(i) As soon as practicable, but normallynot later than 90 days after the conclusion of the formal hearing, thejudge will evaluate the record of the formal hearing and prepare and filea recommended decision with the Administrator. The decision will containfindings of fact, when appropriate, conclusions regarding all materialisuses of law, and a recommendation as to the appropriate action to betaken by the Administrator. The judge will serve a copy of the decisionon each party and upon the Administrator. (ii) Within thirty days after the date the recommended decision is served,any party may file with the Administrator exceptions to the recommendeddecision. The exceptions must refer to all portions of the record and toall authorities relied on in support of the exceptions. (3) <T3>Final decision. </T3>(i) As soon as practicable, but normally not laterthan 60 days after receipt of the recommended decision, the Administratorwill issue a final decision. The final decision will include findings offact and conclusions regarding material issues of law or discretion, aswell as reasons therefor. The final decision may accept or reject all orpart of the recommended decision. The Administrator shall assure that therecord shows the ruling on each exception presented. (ii) With respect to hearings held pursuant to section 116(b), the Administratormay defer announcement of his findings of fact until the time he takesfinal action with respect to any action described in section 116(a). (iii) The Administrator will base the final decision upon the record alreadymade except that the Administrator may issue orders: (A) Specifying the filing of supplemental briefs; or (B) Remanding the matter to the judge for the receipt of further evidence,or otherwise assisting in the determination of the matter. (i) <T3>Filing and service of documents. </T3>(1) Whenever the regulationsin this subpart or an order issued hereunder require a document to be filedwithin a certain period of time, such document will be considered filedas of the date of the postmark, if mailed, or (if not mailed) as of thedate actually delivered to the office where filing is required. Time periodswill begin to run on the day following the date of the document, paper,or event which begins at the time period. (2) All submissions must be signed by the person making the submission,or by the person's attorney or other authorized agent or representative.(3) Service of a document must be made by delivering or mailing a copyof the document to the known address of the person being served. (4) Whenever the regulations in this subpart require service of a document,such service may effectively be made on the agent for the service of processor on the attorney for the person to be served. (5) Refusal of service of a document by the person, his agent, or attorneywill be deemed effective service of the document as of the date of suchrefusal. (6) A certficate of the person serving the document by personal deliveryor by mailing, setting forth the manner of the service, will be proof ofthe service. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subpart J_Enforcement </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.1000 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">General. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Purpose and scope. </T3>(1) Section 302 of the Act authorizes the Administratorto assess a civil penalty, in an amount not to exceed $25,000 for eachviolation, against any person found to have committed an act prohibitedby section 301 of the Act. Each day of a continuing violation is a separateoffense. (2) Section 106 of the Act describes the circumstances under which theAdministrator may suspend or revoke a license or permit, or suspend ormodify activities under a license or permit, in addition to or in lieuof imposing of a civil penalty, or in addition to imposing a fine. (3) Section 306 of the Act makes provisions of the customs laws relatingto, among other things, the remission or mitigation of forfeitures, applicableto forfeitures of vessels and hard mineral resources. The Administratoris authorized to entertain petitions for administrative settlement of propertyseizures made under the Act which would otherwise proceed to judicial forfeiture.(4) Section 114 of the Act authorizes the Administrator to place observerson vessels used by a licensee or permittee under the Act to monitor complianceand environmental effects of activities under the license or permit. (5) Section 117 of the Act describes the circumstances under which a personmay bring a civil action against an alleged violator or against the Administratorfor failure to perform a nondiscretionary duty, and directs the Administratorto issue regulations governing procedures prerequisite to such a civilaction. (6) The regulations in this subpart provide uniform rules and proceduresfor the assessment of civil penalties (andSection; 971.1001-andSection; 971.1002),and license and permit sanctions (andSection; 971.1003); the remission ormitigation of forfeitures (andSection; 971.1004); observers (andSection; 971.1005);protection of certain information related to enforcement (andSection; 971.1006);and procedures requiring persons planning to bring a civil action undersection 117 of the Act to give advance notice (andSection; 971.1007). (b) <T3>Filing and service of documents. </T3>(1) Except as otherwise providedby this subpart, filing and service of documents required by this subpartwill be in accordance with andSection; 971.901(i). The method for computingtime periods set forth in andSection; 971.901(i) also applies to any actionor event, such as payment of a civil penalty, required by this subpartto take place within a specified period of time. (2) If an oral or written request is made to the Administrator within tendays after the expiration of a time period established in this subpartfor the required filing of documents, the Administrator may permit a latefiling if the Administrator finds reasonable grounds for an inability orfailure to file within the time periods. All extensions will be in writing.Except as provided by this paragraph, by 15 CFR 904.102 or by order ofan administrative law judge, no requests for an extension of time may begranted. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.1001 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Assessment procedure. </ITAG>Subpart B of 15 CFR Part 904 governs the procedures for assessing a civilpenalty under the Act, and the rights of any person against whom a civilpenalty is assessed. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.1002 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Hearing and appeal procedures. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Beginning of hearing procedures. </T3>Following receipt of a writtenrequest for a hearing timely filed under 15 CFR 904.102, the Administratorwill begin procedures under this section by forwarding the request, a copyof the NOVA, and any response thereto to the Department of Commerce, Officeof Administrative Law Judges. (b) Subpart C of 15 CFR Part 904 governs the hearing and appeal proceduresfor civil penalties assessed under the Act. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.1003 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">License and permit sanctions. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Application of this section. </T3>This section governs the suspensionor revocation of any license or permit issued under the Act, or the suspensionor modification of any particular activity or activities under a licenseor permit, which suspension, revocation or modification is undertaken inaddition to, or in lieu of, imposing a civil penalty under this subpart,or in addition to imposing a fine. (b) <T3>Basis for sanctions. </T3>The Administrator may act under this sectionwith respect to a license or permit issued under the Act, or any particularactivity or activities under such a license or permit, if the licenseeor permittee substantially fails to comply with any provision of the Act,any regulation or order issued under the Act, or any term, condition, orrestriction in the license or permit. (c) <T3>Nature of sanctions. </T3>In the Administrator's discretion and subjectto the requirements of this section, the Administrator may take any ofthe following actions or combinations thereof with respect to a licenseor permit issued under the Act: (1) Revoke the license or permit; (2) Suspend the license or permit, either for a specified period of timeor until certain stated requirements are met, or both; or (3) Modify any activity under the license or permit, as by imposing additionalrequirements or restraints on the activity. (d) <T3>Notice of sanction. </T3>(1) The Administrator will prepare a noticeof sanction (NoS) setting forth the sanction to be imposed and the basistherefore. The NoS will state: (i) A concise statement of the facts believed to show a violation; (ii) A specific reference to the provisions of the Act, regulation, licenseor permit, or order allegedly violated; (iii) The nature and duration of the proposed sanction; (iv) The effective date of the sanction, which is 30 days after the dateof the notice unless the Administrator establishes a different effectivedate under paragraph (d)(4) or paragraph (e) of this section; (v) That the licensee or permittee has 30 calendar days from receipt ofthe notice in which to request or waive a hearing, under paragraph (f)of this section; and (vi) The determination made by the Administrator under paragraph (e)(1)of this section, and any time period that the Administrator provides thelicensee or permittee under paragraph (e)(1) to correct a deficiency. (2) If a hearing is requested in a timely manner, the sanction becomeseffective as provided in the final decision of the Administrator issuedpursuant to paragraph (g) of this section, unless the Administrator providesotherwise under paragraph (d)(4) of this section. (3) The NoS will be served personally or by registered or certified mail,return receipt requested, on the licensee or permittee. The Administratorwill also publish in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> a notice of his intention to impose a sanction.(4) The Administrator may make the sanction effective immediately or otherwiseearlier than 30 days after the date of the NoS if the Administrator finds,and issues an emergency order summarizing such finding and the basis therefor,that an earlier date is necessary to: (i) Prevent a significant adverse environmental effect; or (ii) Preserve the safety of life and property at sea. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10">If the Administrator acts under this paragraph (d)(4), the Administratorwill serve the emergency order as provided in paragraph (d)(3) of thissection.(5) The NoS will be accompanied by a copy of this subpart and the applicableprovisions of 15 CFR Part 904 and 15 CFR Part 971 Subpart I. (e) <T3>Opportunity to correct deficiencies. </T3>(1) Prior to issuing theNoS, the Administrator will determine whether the reason for the proposedsanction is a deficiency which the licensee or permittee can correct. Suchdetermination, and the basis therefor, will be set forth in the NoS. (2) If the Administrator determines that the reason for the proposed sanctionis a deficiency which the licensee or permittee can correct, the Administratorwill allow the licensee or permittee a reasonable period of time, up to180 days from the date of the NoS, to correct the deficiency. The NoS willstate the effective date of the sanction, and that the sanction will takeeffect on that date unless the licensee or permittee corrects the deficiencywithin the time prescribed or unless the Administrator grants an extensionof time to correct the deficiency under paragraph (e)(3) of this section.(3) The licensee or permittee may, within the time period prescribed bythe Administrator under paragraph (e)(2) of the section, request an extensionof time to correct the deficiency. The Administrator may, for good causeshown, grant an extension. If the Administrator does not grant the request,either orally or in writing before the effective date of the sanction,the request will be considered denied. (4) When the licensee or permittee believes that the deficiency has beencorrected, the licensee or permittee shall so advise the Administratorin writing. The Administrator will, as soon as practicable, determine whetheror not the deficiency has been corrected and advise the licensee or permitteeof such determination. (5) If the Administrator determines that the deficiency has not been correctedby the licensee or permittee within the time prescribed under paragraph(e)(2) or (e)(3) of this section, the Administrator may:(i) Grant the licensee or permittee additional time to correct the deficiency,for good cause shown; (ii) If no hearing has been timely requested under paragraph (f)(1) ofthis section, notify the licensee or permittee that the sanction will takeeffect as provided in paragraph (e)(2) or (e)(3) of this section; or  (iii) If a request for hearing has been timely filed under paragraph (f)(1)of this section, and hearing proceedings have not already begun, or ifthe Administrator determines under paragraph (f)(3) of this section tohold a hearing, notify the licensee or permittee of the Administrator'sintention to proceed to a hearing on the matter. (f) <T3>Opportunity for hearing.</T3> (1) The licensee or permittee has 30days from receipt of the NoS to request a hearing. However, no hearingis required with respect to matters previously adjudicated in an administrativeor judicial hearing in which the licensee or permittee has had an opportunityto participate.  (2) If the licensee or permittee requests a hearing, a written and datedrequest shall be served either in person or by certified or registeredmail, return receipt requested, at the address specified in the NoS. Therequest shall either attach a copy of the relevant NoS or refer to therelevant NOAA case number.  (3) If no hearing is requested under paragraph (f)(2) of this section,the Administrator may nonetheless order a hearing if the Administratordetermines that there are material issues of fact, law, or equity to befurther explored.  (g) <T3>Hearing and decision.</T3> (1) If a timely request for a hearing underparagraph (f) of this section is received, or if the Administrator ordersa hearing under paragraph (f)(3) of this section, the Administrator willpromptly begin proceedings under this section by forwarding the request,a copy of the NoS and any response thereto to the Department of CommerceOffice of Administrative Law Judges which will docket the matter for hearing.Written notice of the referral will promptly be given to the licensee orpermittee, with the name and address of the attorney representing the Administratorin the proceedings (the agency representative). Thereafter, all pleadingand other documents must be filed directly with the Department of CommerceOffice of Administrative Law Judges, and a copy must be served on the opposingparty (respondent or agency representative).  (2) Except as provided in this section, the hearing and appeal proceduresin 15 CFR Part 904 Subpart C apply to any hearing held under this section. (3) If the proposed sanction is the result of a correctable deficiency,the hearing will proceed concurrently with any attempt to correct the deficiencyunless the parties agree otherwise or the Administrative Law Judge ordersdifferently.  (4) As soon as practicable, but normally not later than 90 days after theconclusion of the formal hearing, the judge will file with the Administratora recommended decision prepared in accordance with andSection; 971.901(h)(2). (5) The Administrator will issue a final decision in accordance with andSection;971.901(h)(3). The decision will be a final order of the Administrator. (6) The Administrator will serve notice of the final decision on the licenseeor permittee in the manner described by paragraph (d)(3) of this section. <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.1004  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Remission or mitigation of forfeitures.  </ITAG>(a) Authorized enforcement officers are empowered by section 304 of theAct to seize any vessel (together with its gear, furniture, appurtenances,stores, and cargo) which reasonably appears to have been used in violationof the Act, if necessary to prevent evasion of the enforcement of thisAct, or of any regulation, order or license or permit issued pursuant tothe Act. Enforcement agents may also seize illegally recovered or processedhard mineral resources, as well as other evidence related to a violation.Section 306 of the Act provides for the judicial forfeiture of vesselsand hard mineral resources.  (b) Subpart F of 15 CFR Part 904 governs procedures regarding seized propertythat is subject to forfeiture or has been forfeited under the Act, includingthe remission or mitigation of forfeitures.  (c) Unless otherwise directed in a notice concerning the seized property,a petition for relief from forfeiture under the Act and pursuant to 15CFR 904.506(b) shall be addressed to the Administrator and filed with theOcean Minerals and Energy Division at the address specified in andSection;971.200(b).  <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 971.1005  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Observers.  </ITAG>(a) <T3>Purpose of observers.</T3> Each licensee and permittee shall allow,at such times and to such extent as the Administrator deems reasonableand necessary, an observer (as used in this section, the term ``observer''means ``one or more observers'') duly authorized by the Administrator toboard and accompany any vessel used by the licensee or permittee in explorationor commercial recovery activities (hereafter referred to in this sectionas a ``vessel''), for the purpose of observing, evaluating and reportingon:  (1) The effectiveness of the terms, conditions, and restrictions of thelicense or permit;  (2) Compliance with the Act, regulations and orders issued under the Act,and the license or permit terms, conditions, and restrictions; and  (3) The environmental and other effects of the licensee's or permittee'sactivities under the license or permit.  (b) <T3>Notice to licensee or permittee.</T3> (1) If the Administrator plansto place an observer aboard a vessel, the Administrator will so notifythe affected licensee or permittee.  (2) The Administrator normally will issue any such notice as far in advanceof placement of the observer as is practicable.  (3) <T3>Contents of notice.</T3> The notice given by the Administrator willinclude, among other things:  (i) The name of the observer, if known at the time notice is issued;  (ii) The length of time which the observer likely will be aboard the vessel; (iii) Information concerning activities the observer is likely to conduct,such as:  (A) Identification of special activities that the observer will monitor; (B) Planned tests of equipment used for monitoring;  (C) Activities of the observer that are likely to require assistance fromthe vessel's personnel or crew or use of the vessel's equipment; and  (D) Planned tests of alternative operating procedures or technologies formitigation of environmental effects.  (iv) Information concerning the equipment that will be brought aboard thevessel, such as a description of the monitoring equipment, and any specialrequirements concerning the handling, storage, location or operation of,or the power supply for, the equipment.  (c) <T3>Initial monitoring period.</T3> The Administrator shall require theplacement of an observer on each permittee's mining vessel(s) at leastonce during the initial year of the permittee's commercial recovery activities. (d) <T3>Licensee's and permittee's responsibilities for observer placement.</T3>(1) Upon request by the Administrator, a licensee or permittee shall facilitateobserver placement by promptly notifying the Administrator regarding thetiming of planned system tests and the departure date of the next voyage,or, if the vessel is at sea, suggesting a time and method for transportingthe observer to the vessel.  (2) In addition, the licensee or permittee shall notify NOAA of the dateof departure of planned cruises 60 days in advance of ship departure fromport for purposes of NOAA's determination of whether to place Federal observersonboard. If cruise plans are changed by more than 30 days from the datestated by the exploration or commercial recovery plan, the licensee orpermittee shall notify NOAA as soon as such changes are made, or 90 daysprior to the previously scheduled departure. (e) <T3>Duties of licensee, permittee, owner or operator. </T3>Each licensee,permittee, owner or operator of a vessel aboard which an observer is assignedshall:(1) Allow the observer access to and use of the vessel's communicationsequipment and personnel when the observer deems such access necessary forthe transmission and receipt of messages;(2) Allow the observer access to and use of the vessel's navigation equipmentand personnel when the observer deems such access necessary to determinethe vessel's location;(3) Provide all other reasonable cooperation and assistance to enable theobserver to carry out the observer's duties; and (4) Provide temporary accommodations and food to the observer aboard thevessel which are equivalent to those provided to officers of the vessel.(f) <T3>Reasonableness of observer activities. </T3>(1) To the maximum extentpracticable, observation duties will be planned and carried out in a mannerthat minimizes interference with the licensee's or permittee's activitiesunder the license or permit.(2) The Administrator will assure that equipment brought aboard a vesselby the observer is reasonable as to size, weight, and electric power andstorage requirements, taking into consideration the necessity of the equipmentfor carrying out the observer's functions.(3) The observer will have no authority over the operation of the vesselor its activities, or the officers, crew, or personnel of the vessel. Theobserver will comply with all rules and regulations issued by the licenseeor permittee, and all orders of the Master or senior operations official,with respect to ensuring safe operation of the vessel and the safety ofits personnel.(g) <T3>Non-interference with observer. </T3>Licensees, permittees and otherpersons are reminded that the Act (see, for example, sections 301(3) and301(4)) makes it unlawful for any person subject to section 301 of theAct to interfere with any observer in the performance of the observer'sduties.(h) <T3>Confidentiality of information. </T3>NOAA recognizes the possibilitythat an observer, in performing observer functions, will record informationwhich the licensee or permittee considers to be proprietary. NOAA intendsto protect such information consistent with applicable law. The Administratormay in appropriate cases provide the licensee or permittee an opportunity:(1) To review those parts of the observer's report which may contain proprietaryinformation; and(2) To request confidential treatment of such information under andSection;971.802.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;971.1006 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Proprietary enforcement information.</ITAG>(a) Proprietary and privileged information seized or maintained under TitleIII of the Act concerning a person or vessel engaged in commercial recoverywill not be made available for general or public use or inspection.(b) Although presentation of evidence in a proceeding under this subpartis not deemed general or public use of information, the Administrator will,consistent with due process, move to have records sealed, under 15 CFRPart 904 Subpart C, or other applicable provisions of law, in any administrativeor judicial proceeding where the use of proprietary or privileged informationis required to serve the purpose of the Act.<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;971.1007 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Advance notice of civil actions.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Actions against alleged violators. </T3>(1) No civil action may befiled in a United States District Court under Section 117 of the Act againstany person for alleged violation of the Act, or any regulation, or licenseor permit term, condition, or restriction issued under the Act, until 60days after the Administrator and any alleged violator receive written anddated notice of alleged violation.(2) The notice shall contain:(i) A concise statement of the facts believed to show a violation;(ii) A specific reference to the provisions of the Act, regulation or licenseor permit allegedly violated; and(iii) Any documentary or other evidence of the alleged violation.(b) <T3>Action against the Administrator. </T3>(1) No civil action may be filedin a United States District Court under Section 117 of the Act againstthe Administrator for an alleged failure to perform any act or duty underthe Act which is not discretionary until 60 days after receipt by the Administratorof a written and dated notice of intent to file the action.(2) The notice shall contain:(i) A specific reference to the provisions of the Act, regulation or permitbelieved to require the Administrator to perform a nondiscretionary actor duty;(ii) A precise description of the nondiscretionary act or duty believedto be required by such provision;(iii) A concise statement of the facts believed to show a failure to performthe act or duty; and(iv) Any documentary or other evidence of the alleged failure to performthe act or duty.<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 970_DEEP SEABED MINING REGULATIONS FOR EXPLORATION LICENSES</ITAG>The authority citation for 15 CFR Part 970 continues to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>30 U.S.C. 1401 <T3>et seq.</T3></ITAG>1. In the table of contents for 15 CFR Part 970, the entry for SubpartI is revised and Subparts J and K are removed and reserved to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="72">Subpart I_Miscellaneous</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="70">Sec.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">970.900 Other applicable regulations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="72">Subparts J and K_[Reserved]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 970.200</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>2. In andSection; 970.200, paragraph (f) is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(f) <T3>Request for confidential treatment of information. </T3>If an applicantwishes to have any information in his application treated as confidential,he must so indicate pursuant to 15 CFR 971.802.3. In andSection;970.212, paragraphs (a) and (b)(2) are revised to read asfollows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection;970.212 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Public notice, hearing and comment.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Notice and comments. </T3>The Administrator will publish in the <T4>Federal Register, </T4>for each application for an exploration license,notice that such application has been received. Subject to 15 CFR 971.802,interested persons will be permitted to examine the materials relevantto such application. Interested persons will have at least 60 days afterpublication of such notice to submit written comments to the Administrator.(b) * * *(2) If the Administrator determines there exists one or more specific andmaterial factual issues which require resolution by formal processes, atleast one formal hearing will be held in the District of Columbia metropolitanarea in accordance with the provisions of Subpart I of 15 CFR Part 971.The record developed in any such formal hearing will be part of the basisof the Administrator's decisions on an application.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>4. In andSection; 970.302, paragraph (j) is amended by revising paragraph(j)(1)(i) introductory text, and paragraph (j)(1)(i)(A) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 970.302</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Procedures and criteria for resolving conflicts.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(j) <T3>Unresolved domestic conflict </T3>(1)<T3> Procedure.</T3> (i) In the case of an original domestic conflict ora new domestic conflict, the applicants will be allowed until April 15,1983, to resolve the conflict or agree in writing to submit the conflictto a specified binding conflict resolution procedure. If, by April 15,1983, all applicants involved in an original or new domestic conflict havenot resolved that conflict, or agreed in writing to submit the conflictto a specified binding conflict resolution procedure, the conflict willbe resolved in a formal hearing held in accordance with Subpart I of 15CFR Part 971, except that: (A) The General Counsel of NOAA will not, as a matter of right, be a partyto the hearing; however, the General Counsel may be admitted to the hearingby the administrative law judge as a party or as an interested person pursuantto 15 CFR 971.901 (f)(2) or (f)(3); and <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 970.407</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>In andSection; 970.407, paragraph (d) is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) If a timely request for administrative review of the proposed denialis made by the applicant under paragraph (c)(1) of this section, the Administratorwill promptly begin a formal hearing in accordance with Subpart I of 15CFR Part 971. If the proposed denial is the result of a correctable deficiency,the administrative review will proceed concurrently with any attempts tocorrect the deficiency, unless the parties agree otherwise or the administrativelaw judge orders differently. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>6. In andSection; 970.501, paragraphs (a) and (b)(2) are revised to readas follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 970.501</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Proposal to issue or transfer and of terms, conditions and restrictions.</ITAG>(a)<T3> Notice and comment. </T3>The Administrator will publish in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> notice of each proposal to issue or transfer,and of terms and conditions for, and restrictions on, an exploration license.Subject to 15 CFR 971.802, interested persons will be permitted to examinethe materials relevant to such proposals. Interested persons will haveat least 60 days after publication of such notice to submit written commentsto the Administrator. (b) * * *(2) If the Administrator determines there exists one or more specific andmaterial factual issues which require resolution by formal processes, atleast one formal hearing will be held in the District of Columbia metropolitanarea in accordance with the provisions of Subpart I of 15 CFR Part 971.The record developed in any such formal hearing will be part of the basisfor the Administrator's decisions on issuance or transfer of, and of terms,conditions and restrictions for the license. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 970.508</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>7. In andSection; 970.508, paragraph (d) is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) If a timely request for administrative review of the proposed denialis made by the applicant under paragraph (c)(1) of this section, the Administratorwill promptly begin a formal hearing in accordance with Subpart I of 15CFR Part 971. If the proposed denial is the result of a correctable deficiency,the administrative review will proceed concurrently with any attempt tocorrect the deficiency, unless the parties agree otherwise or the administrativelaw judge orders differently. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 970.510</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>8. In andSection; 970.510, paragraph (d) is revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(d) If, after the Administrator takes final action on an objection, thelicensee demonstrates that a dispute remains on a material issue of fact,the Administrator will provide for a formal hearing which will proceedin accordance with Subpart I of 15 CFR Part 971.9. In andSection; 970.511, paragraphs (a)(1), (b), (e) and (i)(2) are revisedto read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 970.511</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Suspension or modification of activities; suspension or revocationof licenses.</ITAG>(a) The Administrator may: (1) In addition to, or in lieu of, the imposition of any civil penaltyunder Subpart J of 15 CFR Part 971, or in addition to the imposition ofany fine under Subpart J, suspend or revoke any license issued under thispart, or suspend or modify any particular activities under such a license,if the licensee substantially fails to comply with any provision of theAct, this part, or any term, condition or restriction of the license; and<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) Any action taken by the Administrator in accordance with paragraph(a)(1) will proceed pursuant to the procedures in 15 CFR 971.1003. Anyaction taken in accordance with paragraph (a)(2) will proceed pursuantto paragraphs (c) through (i) of this section, other than paragraph (h)(2).<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(e) If a timely request for administrative review of the proposed actionis made by the licensee under paragraph (d)(1) of this section, the Administratorwill promptly begin a formal hearing in accordance with Subpart I of 15CFR Part 971. If the proposed action is the result of a correctable deficiency,the administrative review will proceed concurrently with any attempt tocorrect the deficiency, unless the parties agree otherwise or the administrativelaw judge orders differently. <ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(i) * * *(2) The Administrator determines that immediate suspension of such a license,or immediate suspension or modification of particular activities undera license, is necessary to prevent a significant adverse effect on theenvironment or to preserve the safety of life or property at sea, and theAdministrator issues an emergency order in accordance with andSection; 971.1003(d)(4).<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>10. In Subpart I, andSection; 970.900 is revised and andSection;andSection; 970.901through 970.906 are removed, to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 970.900</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Other applicable regulations.</ITAG>The regulations in Subparts H, I and J of 15 CFR Part 971 are consolidatedregulations and are applicable both to licenses under this part and topermits under 15 CFR Part 971. The regulations in Subparts H, I and J ofPart 971 govern records to be maintained and information to be submittedby licensees and permittees, public disclosure of documents received byNOAA, relinquishment and surrender of licenses and permits, amendment ofregulations, competition of time, uniform hearing procedures, and enforcementunder the Act. <ITAG tagnum="52">Subparts J and K_[Removed and Reserved] </ITAG>11. Subparts J and K (andSection;andSection; 970.1000-970.1107) are removedand reserved.<ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-162 Filed 1-5-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 3610-12-M </ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>